Title
Review for Mission to Mars (2000)
Number of Reviews
36

Author
Gary Jones
"OK. Astronauts go to Mars. Encounter strange alien forces. Fate of crew
unknown. Rescue mission sent to Mars. Meet aliens."
It probably wasn't quite like that, but I shudder to think that people
with the intelligence to tie their own shoelaces might actually have sat
down and thought this thing through. However Mission To Mars made it to
the screen, the result is a film which is not only as offensively stupid
as Armageddon, but which in an attempt to be spiritually uplifting has
an alien encounter even more crass and syrupy than the one which ruined
The Abyss. But the saddest part of all is that it's a Brian De Palma
movie. I've grown up watching his films, and although he has never
achieved the same artistic credibility as his fellow New Yorker Martin
Scorsese, he has always been a fine technician, as demonstrated in films
such as Carrie, The Untouchables, and the under-rated Blow Out. He has
also made a near masterpiece in Carlito's Way, but his technical skill
can't protect him from making the odd stinker, such as Body Double and
The Bonfire of the Vanities. And now Mission To Mars.
The film is crammed full of implausibilities, such as the re-boot of the
spacecraft's entire computer system, and the astonishing and quickly
glossed-over way the astronauts of the rescue mission, seemingly doomed
themselves, make their way to the Martian surface. Perhaps the funniest
is the survival of an astronaut who has lived for a year in a scrappy
windblown tent on the Martian surface - his oxygen and food being
provided by a few houseplants. Even if you buy this, the climate on Mars
might pose some other difficulties that are completely overlooked. Off-
hand, I don't know what the pressure and temperature of the Martian
atmosphere are. I'll just check. Temperatures vary from around minus 120
to minus 20 Fahrenheit and atmospheric pressure is around 0.7 percent of
Earth's. That took about three minutes to find out. Looking stuff up in
books. It's obviously a lost art in Hollywood. 
Does scientific accuracy on movies matter? It depends. When the
spacecraft whoosh past us in Star Wars and the explosions roar, we can
forgive the film-makers for adding the sound effects because they
presumably took the view that the silence of space would detract from
the excitement. Scientifically inaccurate, but fair enough. Often,
however, getting the science right is as easy as getting it wrong and
will only help the dramatic impact of the story. There are no real
excuses for howlers like those in Mission To Mars. A message is coded in
the form of a DNA sequence. (The coding method used is ludicrous, but
we'll let that pass.) On seeing a few turns of the resulting DNA double-
helix displayed on a monitor, an astronaut concludes straight away that
the genetic information is "missing the last two chromosomes". OK, so
the writers don't have a clue about biology, and maybe neither do the
majority of moviegoers, but to get this sort of thing so hopelessly
wrong is pure laziness and is insulting to everyone.
If you can fight through the boredom and embarrassment, you'll find much
of the film strangely familiar. The opening sequence is straight out of
Apollo 13, and the references to 2001: A Space Odyssey are too many to
be accidental - the shape of the spacecraft, the rotating living module,
the dull but precise voice of the computer, the word-for-word reference
to "voice-print identification", and the astronauts in a white room
during their alien encounter. A knowing reference or two is fine, but
this is all a bit much.
The score by the once-great Ennio Morricone is simply awful - when it
isn't crashingly inappropriate it's spacey wallpaper for the ears. The
only thing in the film's favour is the lovely photography by long-time
De Palma collaborator Stephen H. Burum. In fact, his photography is so
good, it almost made the film worth watching. Despite the wonderful
images he has produced, I suspect he won't be introducing himself at
parties as the guy who shot Mission To Mars.  Neither can I see Tim
Robbins or Gary Sinise looking back on this movie as a high point in
their acting careers, although they are to be congratulated for managing
to keep a straight face throughout.
The biggest, but prettiest, heap of interplanetary hooey you'll ever
see.
-- 
Gary Jones 
Homepage: www.bohr.demon.co.uk
PGP public key available from servers (DH/DSS key ID: 0x11EAE903)

Author
Alex Ioshpe
"Houston. We have a serious problem."
After making "Mission: Impossible", Brian De Palma has a lot to live up to.
By making an epic science fiction and inviting great cast and talented crew,
he hopes to reach the modern audience. And the possibilities are certainly
there, but the result is a great disaster.
Starting in a near future, with a prologue copied from "Apollo 13", De Palma
slowly builds up his "story". The human race has already set foot on Mars. A
research expedition has vanished without trace on the red planet and another
one has been sent to find out what happened. This is basically the whole
plot. So it's hard to imagine that it can be stretched to 2 hours. But De
Palma manages to do that. It is not a very good achievement. As we follow
this expedition to Mars and watch them slowly float in space, the hardest
thing to do is stay awake. The film's major problem is that it tries to seem
more clever than it is. David Mamet's dialogue, while trying to seem
natural, is distant and simply fake. De Palma and Mamet wanted to combine
action with a thought provoking plot. The result is more like an
unsuccessful mutation of Kubrick's "2001: A Space Odyssey", "Apollo 13" and
"Godzilla". To make time pass , the creators have inserted several
"refreshing" scientific details, that would not convince a half-crazed frog.
It consists of multiple copies and direct ripp-offs from several great
science fiction films and stories. When it finally presents an almost
original idea, it falls flat because of its uncovered stupidity. I can't
even call this film predictable, since no one with a healthy imagination can
come up with something like this. Sometimes it gets so cheesy, that you'll
start laughing when you're supposed to cry and cry when you're supposed to
laugh. You'll see enormous sandstorms, hear mysterious sounds and, last but
not least, on this "constantly surprising" tour you'll see -- an alien. It's
really hard to find comparisons to such an experience, and I know that I've
never said that before (I thought I never would), but "Lost in Space" is
actually better. That's an achievement in itself!
Director Brian De Palma has stroke gold with "Untouchables" that became an
instant American classic. It is for this film that he will be remembered,
while all his other failures will be forgotten. He'll live to fight another
day! I send the actors my condolences, since they truly do try to transform
into their undeveloped  and dull characters. And both the cinematography,
production design and art direction are very decent. It is because of the
achievement of 254 people, that I rate this film 2/10. Unfortunately their
hard work was in vain. If you have problems with insomnia, I recommend you
this film. If you're not asleep within the first half hour, consult your
doctor.

Author
Christian Pyle
"Mission to Mars" opens in 2020 as a group of astronauts gather for a barbecue
to celebrate the upcoming jaunt to the red planet.  Then we jump ahead thirteen
months and scientist Luke Graham (Don Cheadle) is on Mars with an international
team.  They're out surveying when a sudden tornado attacks them with a
supernatural malevolence.  As the dust clears, a giant stone face is revealed
beneath the Martian soil.  Only Luke survives to crawl back to his base and
send a brief message to mission control before contact is lost.  At mission
control on the World Space Station, Luke's pals Jim McConnell (Gary Sinise) and
Woody Blake (Tim Robbins) plan a rescue mission.  A year later, their ship
nears Mars with two more astronauts along:  Woody's wife Terri Fisher (Connie
Nielsen) and the inexperienced Phil Ohlmyer (Jerry O'Connell).  Things don't go
quite as planned, however, and the rescuers find themselves in mortal danger
before they even get to the planet.
Although it sounds like "'Saving Private Ryan' in space," "Mission to Mars" is
an equal mixture of "2001: A Space Odyssey," "Apollo 13," "Armageddon," and
"Contact."  (For most of the movie, I was mentally naming the source of each
scene and motif.)  "Mars"' closest kin are "2001" and "Contact" because the
central storyline is humanity encountering extraterrestrial life.  Certainly
"Mars" is nowhere close to the magnificence of "2001" (which ranks among the
greatest movies ever made), but it compares favorably to "Contact."  While
"Contact" did a better job at making the translation of a message received from
aliens seem believable ("Mars" rushes through the interpretation of its
message), "Mars" has a better resolution.  "Contact" built a lot of suspense
for the meeting promised by the title, then let audiences down by having the
alien and its world appear as projections from the protagonist's memory.  As a
character on "South Park" put it, "I waited two hours to see the alien, and
it's her goddamn father!"  "Mars" has a much stronger ending.
Produced by a collaboration of the screenwriting team of "Predator" and the
author of "Speed," the script for "Mars" has plenty of thrills and chills, but
character development occurs in awkward patches of down time that almost seem
to have a blinking subtitle saying "character development."  Jim misses his
dead wife.  Woody and Terri love each other.  Phil is  . . . uh . . . wow, they
must have cut that scene.
The premise, of course, is nonsense.  NASA would never undertake a rescue
mission like this to save one astronaut who may already be dead.  It would be
too expensive and time-consuming to be feasible.  (The rescue team arrives a
year after they lost contact with Luke.)  Scientifically-minded folks may also
pick apart the movie's science, but to an English major like me most of it
seemed realistic.  (And in the movies it's not important to be real, only to
seem real).
Bottom line:  Semi-intelligent fun with sporadic action.
Read my reviews and others at the Mad Review: 
http://www.madreview.com/main.html

Author
Scott Hunt
Review by Scott Hunt   Visit me at Movie Hunt
http://netdirect.net/~hunt/index.html)
After a marketing windup of striking visuals and the promise of star
caliber actors, Mission To Mars ends up throwing a whiffleball.
Fiercely unoriginal, Director DePalma cobbles together a film by
borrowing heavily from what has gone before him. There are aliens
similar to those in Close Encounters of the Third Kind. The stranded
astronaut theme is reminiscent of Robinson Crusoe on Mars. The
astronauts encounter space flight difficulties that smack of Apollo 13.
Interior spacecraft visuals are redolent of 2001: A Space Odyssey.
Instead of using these components as a launching pad to create his own
movie, De Palma stops right there, refusing to infuse the film with
anything even remotely resembling cleverness or heart.
Mission to Mars takes it's first wobbly steps at a pre-launch barbeque
in which the perfunctory character introductions are done. During these
surface scans of the characters, we learn that Jim McConnell (Sinise)
has lost his wife. It's a plot point revisted throughout the film with
jackhammer subtlety. The rest of the crew exhibit a bland affability.
There is no contentiousness, no friction to add the the dramatic
tension of these men and women being confined to close quarters for an
extended length of time. Maybe DePalma was going for the comraderie of
The Right Stuff, but in that movie, the astronauts had embers of
personality to warm us through the technical aspects.
It's the year 2020 and this is NASA's first manned excursion to the red
planet. A crew, led by Luke Graham (Cheadle), arrives on Mars and
quickly discovers an anomaly, which they investigate with tragic
results. Graham is able to transmit a garbled distress call back to
Earth. In response, Earth sends a rescue team comprised of McConnell,
Woody Blake (Robbins), wife Terri Fisher (Nielsen) and Phil Ohlmyer
(O'Connell). Obstacles are put in the crew's way and and they matter-of-
factly go about solving them. I should say, McConnell goes about
solving them. Time and again, McConnell is presented as some kind of
wunderkind, which wouldn't be so bad if the rest of the crew didn't
come across as so aggressivelly unremarkable. (Mention should be made
of the misogynistic handling of Fisher in a situation where the entire
crew's mission and life is in mortal danger. On a team of
professionals, she is portrayed as an emotion directed weak link. Women
serve no purpose in the movie other than to serve as a reflection of a
male character's personality trait.)
By the time they land on Mars and try to solve the mystery of what
occurred, Mission to Mars starts laying on the cliches and stilted
dialogue with a heavy brush. There is an adage in film to "show, don't
tell." Mission to Mars does both. Repeatedly. Characters obsessively
explain the obvious, explain their actions as they are doing them,
explain to fellow astronauts facts which should be fundamental
knowledge to them. The film's conclusion is momumentally derivative,
anti-climatic and unsatisying. As I walked out I wondered who the
target audience might be for this film. The best I could come up with
is pre-teen age boys, but in this media saturated era, this film's
components would have been old hat even for them. I have to think what
attracted such talent to this film was the lure of making a  good,
modern day B-movie. The key to such a venture is a certain depth and
sincerity towards the material. I felt no such earnestness.

Author
Steve Rhodes
Brian De Palma, who hasn't made a decent movie in over a decade,
surprising shows with MISSION TO MARS that he can still be as good as he
once was. And for a director who is known for his proclivity for
excessive violence (SNAKE EYES for example), he brings in MISSION TO
MARS at just PG. (Actually, given its intensity, a PG-13 might have been
more appropriate, but that's a minor quibble.)
In a film that pays homage to many other science fiction films that have
gone before it, most notably 2001: A SPACE ODYSSEY, MISSION TO MARS
manages to feel fresh, not derivative. An imaginative and magical film,
it has a mesmerizing effect on the audience as it builds slowly toward
the big secret.
The story and script, which has no less than 4 names attached (Lowell
Cannon, Jim Thomas, John Thomas and Graham Yost), concerns two missions
to Mars in the year 2020. After tragedy strikes the first mission,
another crew is sent to rescue any survivors of the first. Don Cheadle
plays the leader of the first crew. Tim Robbins, Gary Sinise, Connie
Nielsen, and Jerry O'Connell play members of the crew on the rescue
ship.
De Palma's staging choices are truly inspired. In a light-hearted
moment, two married members of the crew dance in the weightlessness of
outer space. This sequence dazzles with a gossamer beauty.
Another breathtaking scene concerns a space walk gone bad. Using the
quietness and solitude of space, De Palma gives us a disaster in
real-time that feels like slow-motion.
Only the music by Ennio Morricone (THE LEGEND OF 1900) sometimes goes
strangely wrong. Half of the time it is lovely, and the other half it is
gratingly inappropriate.
A few of the scenes are delicately funny. What can you do with Dr.
Pepper in space? How about using it as a salvation aid?
MISSION TO MARS runs 1:53. It is rated PG for mild science-fiction
violence. The film would be appropriate for kids 11 and up, although
many younger ones might enjoy it as well.
The film opens nationwide in the United States on Friday, March 10. In
the San Jose area it will be playing at the AMC and the Century
theaters.
Email: Steve.Rhodes@InternetReviews.com
Web: http://www.InternetReviews.com

Author
Dustin Putman
Directed by Brian De Palma.
Cast: Gary Sinise, Don Cheadle, Connie Nielsen, Tim Robbins, Jerry O'Connell, 
Peter Outerbridge, Armin Mueller-Stahl, Kavan Smith, Elise Neal, Kim Delaney.
2000 - 112 minutes
Rated PG (for violence and mild profanity).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, March 11, 2000.
Like so many recent films by Brian De Palma, "Mission to Mars" clearly holds 
promise, but eventually throws it away for a more conventional and 
disheartening approach to the material he is working with. Unlike in his 
early career, when he made several stunning motion picture achievements, such 
as 1976's "Carrie," 1980's "Dressed to Kill," and 1981's "Blow Out," lately 
De Palma has been on autopilot, developing a haphazard adaptation of an 
acclaimed novel (1990's "Bonfire of the Vanities"); an idiotic, disposable 
serial killer movie (1992's "Raising Cain"); and a stylistically impressive, 
but substantially empty-headed thriller (1998's "Snake Eyes"). Even his 1996 
box-office hit, "Mission: Impossible," was a film that left audiences 
scratching their heads as to what exactly it was about. With "Mission to 
Mars," De Palma has entered, for the first time, into blatant hack territory, 
as he dwells too often on melodramatic situations involving characters we 
don't care about, and goes right over the deep end with a conclusion that 
caused me to feel sticky afterwards--from all the cheese, that is.
Aiming a little higher in the outer space genre, as there are no evil aliens 
or slimy space creatures to be found, "Mission to Mars" begins at a picnic on 
Earth for the families of NASA workers who are about to launch up into the 
great big, blue sky. While it is appreciated that screenwriters Jim Thomas, 
John Thomas, and Graham Yost opted to show the astronomers' family life 
before the space mission takes off, it tuns out to (1) be pointless filler, 
since the other family members are never seen or heard from again following 
the fifteen minute prologue, and (2) feature terribly arbitrary dialogue that 
even I wouldn't have the guts to write down on paper. 
Switch forward 13 months, a 4-person crew sent to Mars to investigate an 
anomaly turns tragic when a violent funnel arises and eats all but one: Luke 
Graham (Don Cheadle). Sending an SOS to a space station millions of miles 
away, several of the head passengers turn out to be friends with Luke, 
including space cowboy Jim McConnell (Gary Sinise), still grieving over the 
untimely death of his wife (Kim Delaney, shown fleetingly in flashbacks); the 
spousal team of Woody Blake (Tim Robbins) and Terri Fisher (Connie Nielsen); 
and Phil Ohlmyer (Jerry O'Connell), whom we learn nothing about so I have 
nothing to say concerning him. Problems ensue on their mission to Mars, until 
they finally make it to the red planet, where it becomes increasingly evident 
that there is, in fact, other intelligent life in the universe.
For a movie that is supposed to be an adventure, never before have I seen a 
big-budget picture so absolutely laid back in its style. Whenever something 
troublesome comes up, the film remains slow-moving, as if the lack of gravity 
has also taken away the oxygen in the characters' brains. Even in certain 
life-or-death situations, they are constantly calm and collect, and De Palma 
takes great pains in creating tension and suspense (which he occasionally 
does achieve) without any action at all (save for the awe-inspiring funnel 
sequence at the 20-minute mark, which, sorry to say, folks, is as exciting as 
this film ever gets).
For the opening half, "Mission to Mars" was a relatively enjoyable, if 
problematic, motion picture. Even if they were underwritten, I liked some of 
the characters, particularly husband-and-wife Woody and Terri, whom Tim 
Robbins and Connie Nielsen successfully project the feeling that they are in 
love with each other. There are also three great scenes--the aforementioned 
funnel death setpiece; one in which there is a leak somewhere in their 
spacecraft, causing them to slowly lose oxygen; and another in which a key 
character accidentally overshoots their aim outside the ship, causing him/her 
to hurl out into space to the point of no return. 
'Abysmal' is the best adjective to describe the latter half of "Mission to 
Mars." In place of the previous tautness is a treacly encounter with an 
extraterrestrial (who looks about as realistic as Wiley Coyote), followed by 
a sap-inducing vomit bag of a finale that, if the movie hasn't lost you 
before this, will most certainly run right off the tracks for you here. 
Amidst it all is the eventual answer to the origin of life on Earth, which, I 
guess, is passable, but certainly nothing earthshakingly original or profound.
Special mention should go to Ennio Morricone's laughably bad score which, at 
times, is so overwhelmingly soap opera-ish within scenes that aren't even 
dramatic that it elicited at least a couple laughs from me throughout. The 
organ music (yes, you heard that right) is a little better, and certainly the 
most unconventional element of the film, but it still seems out of place.
Since some of the actors are big talents, even when they are simply cashing 
paychecks (as they are doing in "Mission to Mars") they still equip 
themselves admirably. What isn't admirable is their choice to make this 
picture at all, which holds nothing in the way of inventiveness (it's all 
been seen before, in one way or the other, in such superior films as 1968's 
"2001: A Space Odyssey" and 1977's "Close Encounters of the Third Kind"), and 
everything in the way of corniness. "Mission to Mars" isn't exactly a dull 
experience, but it is a monotonous one, because the capabilities it so 
obviously holds is put to zero good use. 

Author
Homer Yen
If you've ever seen pictures of Mars and have ever
wondered about a fuzzy photograph that resembles a
face on the Martian surface, this movie has a colossal
idea of what it might just be.  What the filmmaker
presents is probably wacky in real life.  But, I
remind you that this film is purely science fiction. 
The whole objective is to take a wild idea and build
around it.  Do you remember a recent sci-fi film
called `Independence Day?'  Then, we were asked to
make a leap of faith and to believe in the Roswell UFO
incident.  If we didn't want to open our minds to
that, then the movie would have collapsed in a
heartbeat.  As you may know, however, `Independence
Day' shattered records at the box office.  So, most of
us took that leap of faith.  Remember, in
science-fiction, there is no limit to the imagination,
so everyone is free to dream the impossible dream.
Director Brian DePalma dreams the impossible dream. 
And the result is `Mission to Mars,' a fun space
odyssey set in the year 2020.  Did I say fun?  Perhaps
you've heard all sorts of negative reviews coming in
from around the country.  Well, I urge you to ignore
them and to first ask yourself this question.  Did you
make that leap of faith in Independence Day?  If you
did, then take only a slightly larger leap (Martian
gravity is less than Earth's, you know?) and you'll
find yourself enjoying a cosmic cocktail that's one
part rescue mission and one part imagination.  
The rescue mission arises because of what happens when
Cmdr. Luke Graham (Don Cheadle) and his team arrive on
Mars.  The team discovers a small mountain that seems
to be made out of metal.  This has Cmdr. Luke baffled,
but when they begin a more intense examination of the
area, an unnatural force is unleashed.  Luke barely
manages to send a weak distress call to the World
Space Station orbiting Earth before his transmission
is lost.
On board the station is a handful of Luke's closest
friends and colleagues whom immediately mobilize to
begin a rescue operation.  Captained by Woody (Tim
Robbins), and supported by a crew of three
specialists, they ready themselves for the journey to
the Red Planet.  The crew members include Jim (Gary
Senise), who has obsessed over the secrets that Mars
might hold; Terri (Connie Nielsen), a strong-willed
woman and wife of Woody; and Phil (Jerry O'Connell), a
sharp-witted young scientist.  Travel to Mars will
take many months and will not be uneventful.  In a
suspenseful and clever sequence, meteor pellets
penetrate the ship's hull, eventually culminating into
a catastrophe that makes the `Apollo 13' accident seem
like a nosebleed.
The gritty astronauts eventually do make their way to
the planet surface and discover some fascinating
information.  This is where you are asked to make the
leap of faith.  The remainder of the film moves away
from the rescue component and now dabbles with the
metaphysical.  I had no problems with where the film
was going, and to be honest, the experience can be
described as a trip to a really cool planetarium where
we are given a Discovery Channel-esque presentation. 
And this is the turning point that every moviegoer
will come to.  If you can't make the leap, then you'll
find this to be a soppy finale.  If you can stay the
course, then imagination will reward you.
Sure, it could have been much, much more.  There could
have been better scripts for the characters.  The pace
of the film could have been more exciting, though it
is quite suspenseful.  And, some of the concepts could
have gone through a reality check.  The film also does
not chart new frontiers and the ideas may be hokey. 
But it is a film that establishes good pace, offers
great visual effects, and tells a fine fictional tale.

Author
Fontaine Lien
"Mission to Mars" is one of those annoying movies where, in the middle
of the movie, you get the sneaking suspicion that the reason the
trailer looks so good is because they showcased ALL the best parts of
the movie: all five minutes of it.  "Mission" *does* give you payoff;
but when it does come, it's too little, too late.
"Mission" has some good ideas, but they get lost in the unbearably
boring delivery, dime-a-dozen dialogue, and spate of good actors
wasted in cardboard-cutout roles.  I'm sure the director and writers
were very proud of each Hallmark moment they came up with, so they
stretch each dramatic moment out like silly putty until it loses all
its charm.  Glances don't communicate any deeper emotions just because
you draw them out for five hours on end.  The film spends an hour on
this kind of stuff, building to its climax.  A lot of it is a cliched
glorification of family relationships, marriage, friendship, unite we
stand divided we fall kind of crap.  There are some spectacular
special effects sequences in this film, and I give it points for
trying to stay true to the science I know (trying is the key word
here).  The sequence with the Martian demonstrating their history is
oddly beautiful and touching, but as mentioned by then we're so sick
of the goddamn thing we want the movie to be over.  Great design, good
intentions, but no cigar.  If you're not a die hard sci-fi, FX or
Jerry O'Connell fan (his character is the only one who has some
semblance of character), don't waste your eight bucks on this.
And what the hell, Tim Robbins died halfway through the movie, in a
STUPID way too.  That's just unforgiveable.

Author
Scott Renshaw
     A few months ago, I was at a press screening for another Touchstone
film which was preceded by a teaser trailer for MISSION TO MARS. As the
trailer unfolded, the critics in the audience began to snicker with
increasing frequency. The imagery used was startling similar to images
from 2001: A SPACE ODYSSEY -- an astronaut in a white room, an approach to
a dark object in the distance, a figure spinning off into space.
     It was comical not just because of the familiarity, but because it
seemed so quintessentially Brian De Palma. This was, after all, the
director who had built a 25 year career on cribbing from his most talented
predecessors. The train station sequence in THE UNTOUCHABLES came from
Eisenstein's POTEMKIN; the single-take opening sequence in SNAKE EYES felt
like Welles' TOUCH OF EVIL; whole heaping chunks of his early films
appropriated Hitchcockian devices and themes. So why wouldn't De Palma
take on the most iconic science-fiction film ever made while making his
first science-fiction film? Why not add Kubrick to his list of victims of
auteur homage?
     To be fair, MISSION TO MARS the film is not nearly as similar to 2001
as the trailers might lead you to fear. It's more alarming that it's
similar to the cookie-cutter Hollywood approach to any story. The film
focuses primarily on the aftermath of the first manned mission to Mars in
the year 2020. After an unexplainable phenomenon kills the rest of his
crew, Mission Commander Luke Graham (Don Cheadle) sends a cryptic message
back to mission control. That message sets in motion a recovery mission
led by Commander Woody Blake (Tim Robbins) and pilot Jim McConnell (Gary
Sinise), both close friends of Graham. The recovery team members face
their own perils on the way to the Red Planet, risking their lives to
discover its mysterious secret.
     The frustrating thing about any Brian De Palma film is that you can
always count on at least one extended sequence where you realize what a
brilliant technical craftsman he can be. That sequence in MISSION TO MARS
comes about halfway through the film, a 20-minute stretch following an
accident in which the recovery craft starts losing atmosphere. A chain
reaction of events following that accident keeps building tension, leading
to some genuinely tense moments. De Palma's sense for timing this sort of
sequence is impeccable -- recall the editing of Tom Cruise's computer room
break-in in MISSION: IMPOSSIBLE -- leading to the hope that MISSION TO
MARS can maintain that sort of visual and emotional energy.
     And then you remember this is Brian De Palma. Every once in a while,
by sheer twisted accident, De Palma ends up working with a rich, smart
script -- THE UNTOUCHABLES, BLOW OUT, CARLITO'S WAY. More often, you get
the impression that he looks for a script with a few places he can show
off his visual flair. MISSION TO MARS has its showcase sequence, but it
also has a leaden script full of plug-and-play characterizations. Sinise's
McConnell is portrayed as haunted by the death from cancer of his beloved
wife/fellow astronaut ("NYPD Blue's" Kim Delaney in flashback); Cheadle
gets a sensitive moment with his anxious son on the night before his
departure. It's the sort of mawkish back-story screenwriters use all the
time in adventure films, in a token -- and usually futile -- attempt to
show that the people matter more than the concept.
     Ironically, MISSION TO MARS is that rare case where the concept does
matter more than the people. Kubrick understood that 2001 was about the
mysteries of the universe and the flight of the entire human race, not
just whether Dave Bowman was torn up over his personal tragedies. When
MISSION TO MARS gets metaphysical, it makes sure there's someone on hand
to narrate every brutally obvious revelation, and someone whose individual
journey to wholeness will be completed by this close encounter. This film
doesn't end with the awe of creation; it ends with tedious exposition
topped off by an interplanetary clasping of hands. There are flashes of
Brian De Palma the visceral thrill-master in MISSION TO MARS, but he
doesn't seem to know what to do with its limp conclusion. This time
around, he opts not to rip-off a master. This time around, it probably
would have been a good idea.

Author
Jamey Hughton
Starring-Gary Sinise, Don Cheadle, Tim Robbins,
Jerry O'Connell, Connie Nielsen and Kim Delaney
Director-Brian De Palma
Canadian Rating-PG
Released by Touchstone Pictures - 03/00
It's been hours since I returned from the much anticipated sci-fi opus
`Mission to Mars', and I can still detect the reek of moldy cheddar.
Why? The movie is a shoddy cheesefest full of digital eye candy, stapled
carelessly onto a flimsy screenplay which somehow manages to leapfrog
the great promise of a space opera, instead shooting for the angle of a
feel-good science fiction drama more akin to `2001: A Space Odyssey'. I
got the feeling that most of my fellow movie-going patrons were
expecting another `Armageddon'. But no, `Mission to Mars' certainly
isn't one large action sequence about colossal disaster. This is a
supposedly thoughtful, family-friendly space flick in which the
apocalyptic excitement takes a back seat to visual elegance and
uplifting drivel. You have been warned.
Of course, crafting a tightly claustrophobic space drama is not
impossible (see `Apollo 13' for an excellent example), but few directors
possess the skill and craftsmanship to pull it off without seriously
scarring their reputation. Brian De Palma has enough directorial
expertise and visual wizardry up his sleeve to pull it off. When he gets
his hands on an intelligent, systematically practical script like `The
Untouchables' or `Mission: Impossible', the director has the ability to
create a sound technical achievement (although his overly indulgent
style becomes bothersome more than occasionally). Of course, there's
also the inexcusable string of crap that has carried his name (including
`Snake Eyes' and the notorious bomb `The Bonfire of the Vanities')....
all of which makes me want to call De Palma the most talented hack in
Hollywood. That term may be too harsh, but if I were judging him solely
on the perpetual waste of talent that is `Mission to Mars', my choice of
words would have been slightly less lenient.
If I were Gary Sinise, I wouldn't touch De Palma with a 10-foot pole.
Sinise is a wonderful, wonderful actor, but after appearing in `Snake
Eyes' and this vomit-inducing sham, I'm sure he wouldn't want to risk
the embarrassment of a third collaboration. The Academy Award-winner
plays NASA astronaut Jim McConnell, a man who recently lost his wife
(Kim Delaney) and is apparently psychologically unfit for an upcoming
space shuttle mission to Mars (oops, forgot to mention the year - 2020).
After a barbecue get-together for the astronauts, we cut to Luc Goddard
(Don Cheadle) and his team, who are already taking measurements and
calculations on the Red Planet. Suddenly, a towering formation of rocks
and soil - probably best dubbed a `sand tornado' - appears and creates a
whirlwind of suction. For some reason, the astronauts just stand there
calmly to admire this, as if it were a lovely piece of art. The team is
killed within seconds, expect for Luc, who was able to send one final
transmission and may still be alive.
Immediately, a second mission - consisting of astronauts McConnell,
husband and wife Woody and Terri Blake (Tim Robbins and Connie Nielsen)
and Phil Ohlmyer (Jerry O'Connell) - are dispatched to rescue Luc and
discover the mysterious secret of planet Mars. Let's put the `secret' on
hold for now, and discuss the trip there. It is explained, whether
scientifically accurate or not (probably not), that a trip to Mars takes
roughly six months. I'm not sure why the quartet of screenwriters behind
`M2M' didn't capitalize on this juicy opportunity of creating tension
and claustrophobia. Instead, we join the team during their final days
aboard the ship. What happened during the five months prior to this? Did
they just play cards and tell dirty jokes? Still, there are few nicely
tense moments (maybe the only in the movie) during the time-frame
involving a fuel leak. DePalma's  direction is quite good in these
scenes, although the score by Ennio Morricone is largely inconsistent
(organ music in space? C'mon).
There's a few good, imaginative ideas in the landslide of cheese, a sad
realization that causes me to sigh out loud. It's a colossal bummer that
`Mission to Mars' is poorly assembled and laughably written, with a
dubious and supremely silly finale that will only satisfy dedicated
optimists. As mentioned before, anyone looking for some disaster-movie
carnage is going to feel savagely disappointed... maybe even cheated.
After the unbelievably hokey final shot (with the words The End'
somehow adding insult to injury), a few audience members made the effort
to boo and hiss at the screen. Others muttered obscenities, shaking
their heads in disbelief while mumbling `Jeez, that sucked.' Okay, it
did suck.
But you have to show the actors some sympathetic mercy... after all,
they do pretty well. Sinise is sincere and effective in many of his
scenes, Robbins and Nielsen wholeheartedly convince as a loving NASA
couple, and funnyman O'Connell - well, he has a couple lines are
actually amusing (and intentionally so). The digital effects
accompanying the sand tornado sequence are quite impressive. So, by
golly, where did this `Mission' go wrong? Looking back on the appalling
experience, I would say in practically every conduit and crevasse it
could have. While watching `Mission to Mars', my suggestion would be to
immediately abort, or better yet, don't even strap yourself in for
lift-off.
Your Comments Appreciated!  movieviews@hotmail.com

Author
James Sanford
        Many science-fiction epics save their best effects for the
finale, forcing us to wait 90 minutes for something spectacular to
happen. "Mission to Mars," on the other hand, gives us the best it has
to offer in its first 30 minutes. That's happy news for people who tend
to doze off halfway through a movie, but not for those who like a
last-minute jolt on their way out of the theater.
 What the special effects crew has come up with is truly a
marvel: a Martian whirlwind that churns like a tornado, slithers like a
snake and growls like a chorus of angry bears. Anything or anyone that
gets in its way is sucked in and torn to pieces. It's quite a sight.
 Unfortunately, in terms of imagination, it's also the high
point of the film. The audience spends the next hour eagerly
anticipating the appearance of something even more awesome, more
frightening.
 You might as well be waiting for Godot.
 If it can't deliver much in the way of mind-blowing surprises,
"Mars" deserves some credit for at least trying to create a bit of human
drama as married astronauts Woody (Tim Robbins) and Terry (Connie
Nielsen) lead a rescue team to the red planet after an expedition is
nearly wiped out by that mysterious twister. Along for the ride are
jokester Phil (Jerry O'Connell) and the subdued, troubled Jim (Gary
Sinise), who is still trying to cope with the loss of his wife, also an
astronaut.
 Director Brian DePalma squeezes a considerable amount of
suspense out of the problem-plagued journey to Mars -- some of the
trials the crew face may remind you of "Apollo 13" -- while
incorporating a lot of the dizzying camerawork he's famous for. There's
a real shocker of a moment involving Phil and a nicely executed sequence
in which one of the quartet makes a slip-up and ends up adrift in space.
The dialogue is often overwrought ("What are you doing?!" "I'll tell you
what I'm not doing -- watching you die!"), but that's hardly uncommon in
these kinds of adventures and it doesn't diminish the tension.
 The screenplay by Jim Thomas, John Thomas and Graham Yost has
used up all its best ideas, however, by the time the third act begins.
After a lengthy and portentous build-up, what the rescuers discover on
Mars seems truly anti-climactic, although it should put a smile on the
faces of the Weekly World News staff who've long speculated about that
odd "face" on the Martian surface.
 The big revelation about the origins of life seems to have been
pulled directly from those pop-science "Chariots of the Gods" books that
were all the rage in the 1970s and, without giving too much away, let's
just say you'll certainly sense the hand of Disney in the last reel.
"Mars" is further undercut by a organ and string-saturated musical score
by Ennio Morricone that might have been appropriate for a Barbra
Streisand vehicle but sounds woefully out of place here. Instead of
lifting us up, it flattens us nearly every step of the way, particularly
in the last few minutes.
 Aside from "Obsession" and "The Untouchables," DePalma has
usually been a director more intrigued by sensationalism than by
sentiment and that comes through clearly in "Mars." It's evident he's
more excited and inspired by the danger of the trip than by the
destination itself. In "Mission to Mars," getting there isn't half the
fun, it's almost all the fun. James Sanford

Author
John Beachem
Directed by: Brian DePalma
Written by: Lowell Cannon (story), Jim Thomas
As I was walking out of "Mission to Mars", the first thing that flashed
through my mind was: "I think I just watched a really cheesy version of "The
Abyss". This isn't surprising, as director Brian DePalma has a history of
bad movies. While he may have experienced a brief moment of brilliance with
"The Untouchables", back in 1987, the majority of his career has consisted
of films such as "Bonfire of the Vanities" and "Snake Eyes". "Mission to
Mars" is no exception. While it may have an occasional moment of humor,
mainly due to the presence of Tim Robbins and Jerry O'Connell ("Scream 2",
"Jerry Maguire"), the majority of the film is packed with horrifyingly bad
dialogue and some amazingly cheesy special effects.
The year is 2020, and mankind is finally going to send astronauts to the
surface of Mars. The mission will consist of four astronauts, led by Luc
Goddard (Don Cheadle). While things appear to be going well at first, the
group is suddenly attacked by a massive hurricane on the surface. A rescue
attempt is immediately planned by Jim McConnell (Gary Sinise), who was
originally supposed to lead the first mission, but suffered from something
of a nervous breakdown when his wife died. Going with McConnell are Phil
Ohlmyer (Jerry O'Connell), Woody Blake (Tim Robbins), and Woody's wife Terri
(Connie Nielsen). This group's mission is to discover what went wrong on the
surface and bring back any possible survivors.
With a great cast like the one here, you have to ask yourself how even Brian
DePalma could go wrong. Perhaps the biggest problem is that most of the
characters have no personality. Robbins and O'Connell may be humorous, but
we couldn't care less about their characters. Gary Sinise, normally a great
actor, looks half asleep throughout the entire film, and Connie Nielsen
("Rushmore", "Soldier") is given absolutely nothing to do. Only Don Cheadle
("Out of Sight", "Bulworth") manages to spark some life into his role. I
think "Mission to Mars" was supposed to be something of a disaster movie,
but it's hard for a disaster movie to work if the audience isn't attached to
the characters.
Another thing I noticed, as I was slowly being put to sleep, is that
everything in this film moves very languidly. The movie is filled with
boring scenes such as the camera panning sluggishly over the horrible
looking Mars sets; or a trio of astronauts descending towards the planet for
several minutes without the camera moving or even any music playing. I was
actually, at times, reminded of "2001: A Space Odyssey", but without the
wonderful music. On the rare occasions  the music is present in "Mission to
Mars", it's corny and melodramatic, even during scenes which aren't remotely
emotional. To go along with this trite, stale music, we're usually given
cheesy and overly dramatic dialogue in even more overemotional scenes.
I will admit that "Mission to Mars" starts to pick up near the last thirty
minutes or so, only to fall flat on its face in the last ten minutes. The
one remarkable thing about this film is the amazing cyclone used near the
middle of the story. However, after the extraordinary effect created here,
we're then given some of the worst effects seen in the past five years near
the end of the film. I found it surprising that while "The Abyss" changed
from disaster movie to emotional alien encounter movie flawlessly, this same
transistion in "Mission to Mars" feels incredibly out of place. Actually,
I'd suggest that everyone go back and rent "The Abyss" rather than see this
film. "Mission to Mars" runs an amazingly long 113 minutes, and I can't
honestly recommend it to anyone. I give the film two out of five stars.
Comments? Feel free to e-mail them to: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
For past reviews, movie news, and other fun stuff, visit:
http://www.dependentfilms.net
* * * * * - One of the greatest movies ever made, see it now.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad, see it only if you have nothing better to do.
* - One of the worst movies ever made. See it only if you enjoy pain.

Author
Christopher Null
     MISSION TO MARS starts out with so much promise, it's hard to
believe it could be anything but successful.  The film has already taken
a lot of flack for appearing to be a ripoff of 2001: A SPACE ODYSSEY,
but maybe, I thought, it would transcend Kubrick's early sci-fi drama
and put a new spin on things.  Maybe blend it with a little ARMAGEDDON -
you know, do the space movie right for once.
     In 2020, the first manned mission to Mars is about to launch.
Under the command of Luke Graham (Don Cheadle), the craft lands without
a hitch, and within days they've made a startling discovery.  A little
radar probing turns up a strange metal just under the surface of Mars,
and a mysterious disaster quickly wipes out the crew.
     Enter Commander Woody Blake (Tim Robbins), his wife Terri (Connie
Nielsen), co-pilot Jim McConnell (Gary Sinise), and goofy scientist Phil
Ohlmyer (Jerry O'Connell), and it's rescue time: ARMAGEDDON, full
throttle.
     Uh-oh, problems on the rescue ship.  Now it's time for some APOLLO
13 action.  Tense drama ensues, which isn't half bad.  But things don't
turn out so hot, and just as quickly we're thrown into a space ROBINSON
CRUSOE.
     With a handful of survivors on the red planet, they figure they'll
do a bit of investigating since, you know, they're *there* and all.  In
a matter of hours, McConnell's got the secrets figured out and *wham!*
we're into CLOSE ENCOUNTERS OF THE THIRD KIND.  (Here's a hint straight
from the movie's dialogue: "They are us.  We are them."  Yes, I'm
serious.)
     Which takes us straight into CONTACT, and from there we degenerate
into every bad Disney movie ever made.  From the god-awful organ
soundtrack alone, you'll think you've landed dead smack in the middle of
THE LITTLE MERMAID.  But in space.
     If my rampant sarcasm hasn't clued you in yet, MISSION TO MARS is
so unredeemably bad it drew ribald laughter during its Seriously
Dramatic Moments and horrendous booing over the closing credits.  The
acting is so wooden it might as well have been performed by
marionettes.  The script is so awful I have trouble believing it was not
written by primates.
     The unintentional humor in MISSION TO MARS can certainly make for a
lively time at the movie theater, but it's hardly a reason to pay money
to watch this disaster on celluloid.  If Disney wanted to make this a
comedy, they should have taken this advice:  Try casting Mike Myers,
Eddie Murphy, Janeane Garofalo, and Jason Alexander as our space
heroes.  Now *that* would be a mission to Mars.
Director: Brian De Palma
Producer: Tom Jacobson
Writer: Jim Thomas, John Thomas, Graham Yost
Starring: Gary Sinise, Don Cheadle, Connie Nielsen, Jerry O'Connell, Kim
Delaney, Tim Robbins
---
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com

Author
Jon Popick
If you're going into Mission to Mars expecting an Armageddon-like
testosterone fest, think again.  It's more of a cerebral space flick,
closer to 2001: A Space Odyssey and Contact than Independence Day.  Mars
is rated `PG,' so the violence is relatively tame, but there are enough
edge-of-your-seat, nail-biting scenes to make it worthwhile.  In
Armageddon, you had a pretty good idea that everything would work out
and that the Earth would be saved, but one of Mars' best features is its
unpredictability.
Mars opens in 2020 on the eve of a groundbreaking mission to the red
planet.  The first-of-its-kind journey will take six months each way,
with the crew spending a full year on the surface of Mars.  During the
opening party scene celebrating the impending mission, Mars introduces
us to the main characters of the film.  There's the husband/wife team of
Woody Blake (Tim Robbins, Arlington Road) and Terri Fisher (Connie
Nielsen, Soldier) and the husband/dead wife team of Jim and Maggie
McConnell (Gary Sinise, Reindeer Games and Kim Delaney, NYPD Blue).  The
idea of NASA allowing married couples to participate in the same
missions is preposterous, and Mars' writers brush the issue off like an
insignificant complaint.  Other characters include Luke Goddard (Don
Cheadle, The Rat Pack) and Phil Ohlmyer (Jerry O'Connell, Body Shots),
the latter of whom seems way too thick to be involved with space travel.
When the party scene ends, Mars quickly flashes forward thirteen months,
where the four-man Mars crew has already landed and set up their base
camp on an area of the fourth planet called Cydonia.  Using a
remote-controlled mini-rover, they see a strange triangular mass on the
top of a mountain.  When the crew tries to bounce radar off of the
mysterious object, it gets all angry and creates that red sand vortex
thing that you've probably seen in the film's trailer (and last year in
The Mummy, but who's counting?).  Casualties ensue, and a rescue mission
is immediately launched from the World Space Station to save the
remaining member(s).
The rescue mission, which is supposed to take six months, is
catastrophically doomed, as well.  They have to land on Mars during a
huge sandstorm, which seems pretty scary since I don't even like to land
at LaGuardia when it's drizzling.  I won't reveal which characters are
in each mission because that would ruin the surprise of who gets bumped
off.  And it is kind of surprising.  Also shocking is the fact that when
the rescue mission lands, the survivor(s) are all disheveled and
unshaven.  Like they wouldn't have brought razors for the original
two-year mission.
Mars was directed by Brian De Palma (Snake Eyes) and penned by a
hodgepodge of screenwriters (Jim and John Thomas, Wild Wild West and
Graham Yost, Hard Rain).  The script is pretty well developed, fully
focusing on the crew and their mission.  In fact, the only non-space
scene in the film is the opening party shot.  You don't see the launch,
you don't see what I imagine would be incredible media hype surrounding
the mission, and you don't see any grieving wives and children.  What's
more, you don't even know if anyone on Earth is privy to the deep space
predicament.
Adding to the glossy sheen of Mars are cinematographer Stephen H. Burum
(an Oscar nominee for Hoffa), editor Paul Hirsch (Oscar winner for Star
Wars) and scoremeister Ennio Morricone (recent Golden Globe winner for
The Legend of 1900).  De Palma shows why he's one of the more
experienced directors around with just one long scene that takes place
in a rotating, no-gravity portion of the rescue ship.  Mars' special
effects are solid and the sound is particularly amazing.  It may not
make you ponder the meaning of Man's existence, but you should still be
entertained.
1:49 - PG for violence and mild adult situations

Author
Ian Waldron-Mantgani
Rated on a 4-star scale
Screening venue: Odeon (Liverpool City Centre)
Released in the UK by UIP on April 14, 2000; certificate PG; 113 minutes; 
country of origin USA; aspect ratio 2.35:1
Directed by Brian De Palma; produced by Tom Jacobson.
Written by Lowell Cannon, Jim Thomas, John Thomas, Graham Yost.
Photographed by Stephen H. Burum; edited by Paul Hirsch.
"Mission to Mars" is too long-winded and stone-faced to be intended as 
comedy, and yet I wonder how anyone could expect us to take it seriously. 
This is one of the most ridiculous sci-fi movies ever made, which is no mean 
feat, considering all the trashy B-pictures of the 1950s and zombie flicks of 
the 80s. 
The tone is set early on, by clunky passages of dialogue designed to get the 
audience up to speed on the plot. An example: "Hey, man, you must be feeling 
really upset now, because this used to be your mission. Jeez, if only your 
wife hadn't died, and you hadn't gotten so depressed and had to pull out." 
Give me a break.
The speaker is Luke Graham (Don Cheadle), an astronaut preparing to go on a 
four-man mission to Mars. His team's goal is to research the feasibility of 
human colonisation. When drilling for water on the red planet, his partners 
come under the spell of a giant face-shaped sculpture, which sucks them into 
a sandstorm reminiscent of last year's "The Mummy" and disembowels them.
News of the deaths reaches NASA headquarters. Soon afterward radio contact is 
lost. A new quartet, played by Gary Sinise, Jerry O'Connell, Tim Robbins and 
Connie Nielsen, are sent to the rescue. The three of them who survive the 
trip find Graham with Christ-like hair and beard, ranting and raving about 
the mystical life forces that guide us, or something. Everybody gathers round 
to look at the big sculpture, and through guesswork so miraculous that it 
must be based on telepathy from the gods, they suss out how to enter it 
safely.
This illogical business leads to an amazing moment in which the film's heroes 
discover an alien learning zone; it's a visually arresting scene, but too 
little too late to save this silly movie. Want to know why only three of the 
four rescue pilots make it to Mars? Because halfway through their journey 
they abandon ship and decide to float through outer space to another one. 
Robbins is unable to manoeuvre himself successfully -- what a surprise, I 
thought the task would be something anyone could pull off with ease!
They've taken the drastic measure because of an emergency onboard their 
rocket, which emerges completely nonsensically, when O'Connell is typing an 
instruction into the ship's computer. For no particular reason, the keyboard 
breaks, and in an unfathomable development, this causes the cabin to start 
losing pressure. At first we don't even realise there's any danger, partly 
because of the situation's implausibility, but mainly due to the scene's lack 
of urgency. The characters drift around without any panic, talking things 
over in technical jargon, as a slow, toneless organ tune plays on the sound 
track. Odd for most movies, typical of this one.
"Mission to Mars" was directed by Brian De Palma, who once made pictures like 
"Carrie", "Blow Out" and "Scarface". Watching it, I was reminded of a 
television interview with Quentin Tarantino, in which he mentioned that a lot 
of good filmmakers lose their creativity, and end up doing bad studio 
vehicles just for the pay packet. I hope De Palma isn't going down that road. 
But surely even Tarantino, who is one of the director's greatest fans, will 
recognise that "Mission to Mars" is not a good sign.
COPYRIGHT(c) 2000 Ian Waldron-Mantgani
Please visit, and encourage others to visit, the UK Critic's website, which 
is located at http://members.aol.com/ukcritic

Author
Shay Casey
Year: 2000.
Starring Gary Sinise, Tim Robbins, Don Cheadle, Connie Nielsen, Jerry O'
Connell, Kim Delaney, Elise Neal, Peter Outerbridge, Armin 
Mueller-Stahl.
Written by Lowell Cannon (story), Jim Thomas & John Thomas (story &
screenplay), Graham Yost (screenplay).
Directed by Brian De Palma.
Rated PG.
There should be a requirement that a potential viewer be under a
certain film IQ in order to see "Mission to Mars." There are probably
quite a few people who are going to enjoy it, and most of them will
probably be those who have seen very few films of its kind. But there
are those who will not, and those will most likely be people who have
already seen one or more of the following movies: "2001: A Space
Odyssey," "Armageddon," "Apollo 13," "The Abyss," "Close Encounters of
the Third Kind," "E.T. the Extra-Terrestrial," "Alien," and "Aliens."
Why? Because there is not one original idea in "Mission to Mars." All
of it is cribbed from other films (and in most cases, better
films). If this is the sort of thing you don't mind, you might like
the film. Of course, there are other reasons not to like "Mission to
Mars," the main one being a script written by people who seem to
assume their audience is filled with people who haven't used their
brains in some time, and who don't intend to start during the film's
running time. "Mission to Mars" manages to be both stupid and boring
at the same time.
The plot, cribbed greatly from "2001," concerns a team sent to Mars,
the first manned trip ever made to the red planet. Luke Graham (Don
Cheadle) leads the team, jointly formed of Americans and Russians. The
team encounters a mysterious monolith that emits a strange pulse (this
being nothing like the pulse-emitting monolith in "2001" -- that one
was on the *moon*), but when they try to study it, a giant sand
tornado comes out of the top and swallows them (all except Luke, who
survives long enough to send a garbled message back to the rotating
space station, which looks strangely like the rotating space station
in "2001"). A rescue mission is planned with husband & wife team Woody
Blake (Tim Robbins) and Terri Fisher (Connie Nielsen), obligatory
pilot with a troubled past Jim McConnell (Gary Sinise), and extra crew
member Phil Ohlmyer (Jerry O'Connell) along for the ride.  After some
zero-gravity dancing, they run into problems when one of their engines
is blown, forcing them to attempt a desperate landing aboard a supply
vessel. Now stranded on Mars with minimal supplies, the team must
decide whether or not it can risk entering the monolith or if they
should return home. After all, that monolith just might contain
information about how life originated on Earth.
"Mission to Mars" is one of those films that makes a critic wonder
where to start when talking about all the things that are wrong with
it, so let's start with one of the things that does work: Director
Brian De Palma manages to create some eerie tension in a few scenes
during the middle of the film.  That's it. Everything else fails. The
failure isn't De Palma's fault; he's working from an atrocious
script. Only during the sequence aboard the ship (looking an awful lot
like the Jupiter vessel in "2001") where the rescue team's air begins
running out and they must frantically search for the hole and patch it
up does "Mission to Mars" come to life. A scene where they attempt to
save a comrade floating away into space also provides some tension,
until you realize that the entire danger/more danger/attempted rescue
sequence has absolutely nothing to do with the rest of the film; it's
just a contrived way to generate thrilling scenes. Take it out, and
the plot isn't affected in any way. The sequence also suffers from a
few plot holes (as does the rest of the film): Why is the ship's
computer (which sounds strangely like HAL from, uh, "2001") able to
detect a hole in the main chamber but not one in the engine? Why did
Tim Robbins' character have to go outside the ship when the solution
easily presented itself from inside?  Shouldn't the astronauts be
better trained to deal with a hull breach?
Why are the characters such idiots? Because the script makes little
attempt to properly develop them. All the "conflict" is clumsily
delivered in excruciatingly obvious exposition in the opening scene
(which rips off Orson Welles and Robert Altman by utilizing a long
opening tracking shot) during which the characters repeatedly tell
each other about things all of them should already know: "Jim, it's
too bad you can't go on this mission because you were determined
'psychologically inadequate' because your wife died right before you
were to go on the mission together" -- does anyone really talk like
this? Can't we find out these things in a less grating matter, like
maybe in a flashback? The whole film is like that. The filmmakers are
not content to merely show us something and assume we know what's
going on; they must *tell* us exactly what we're looking at *every*
time.
That exchange isn't actually in "Mission to Mars," but I wouldn't be
surprised if it were. For all their cribbing from Kubrick, Spielberg,
James Cameron, and even Ron Howard, the makers of this film haven't
learned to do something all those directors did very well: show and
don't tell. De Palma used to know how, but seems to have
forgotten. This is mentally-challenged filmmaking; they assume the
audience won't get what's going on, so they explain everything five
times over. Fourth-graders may appreciate this, but more learned
viewers will have their intelligence insulted.
The principal actors sleepwalk their way through "Mission to Mars,"
never managing to do away with an apparent "I'm just here to get a
paycheck" attitude. Cheadle stumbles over his awkward lines. Armin
Mueller-Stahl manages to thoroughly embarrass himself in an unbilled
cameo. Robbins puts his game face on and phones in his standard
"decent guy" performance.  And Sinise hams it up with "wistful" facial
expressions while watching tapes of his dead wife (played by Kim
Delaney, who only has one scene during which she still manages to
deliver some ridiculous dialogue in a heavy-handed monologue about the
meaning of life), and especially during the
stolen-from-no-less-than-three-movies (a lollipop to whoever names
them) conclusion, which combines endless, obvious explanation and
sub-par CGI effects with gagging sentimentality and is sure to
alienate any viewers who had been enjoying the show up until then. And
of course, these aliens from Mars who facilitated the evolution of
life on Earth are entirely different from the aliens in "2001" who
facilitated the evolution of life on Earth; those aliens were from an
*unknown* world.
It could be said that fans of brainless action films might enjoy
"Mission to Mars," but such a comment ignores the fact that the film
is also incredibly slow-going. Leisurely pacing might have helped a
film with a little more substance to it, but all of the substance of
"Mission to Mars" has been stolen from other films, and those other
films dealt with their ideas in a much more thoughtful fashion and
generally contained more engaging characters. Supposedly we're
intended to choke up when one character decides not to return home at
the end of this one (totally different from the
one-character-decides-not-to-return ending of "Armageddon"), but I
suspect most people will either be laughing or groaning. Me, I
alternated between the two. There is only one good thing about the way
"Mission to Mars" finally ends: the fact that the movie is over.
For more reviews, go to http://www.geocities.com/sycasey/movies.html

Author
Mac VerStandig
---A copy of this review can be found at
http://www.moviereviews.org/mission_to_mars.htm ---
Mission to Mars is, simply put, an instant popcorn classic. It is a movie to
be seen by the masses over and over; the type of production that will be
applauded by audiences everywhere despite critics' reviews and re-released
every so often in order for each generation to take in its full big-screen
glory.
It's not a new idea - intelligent life elsewhere. Neither is a rescue
mission into the dark realms of space nor a patriotic mid-film moment when
an American flag is hoisted into alien soil. Actually, very little in
Mission to Mars is original at all. It is the combination of these grandiose
sci-fi ideas, some of the most mystifying special effects ever produced, and
Brian DePalma's ability to mix what previous directors Stanley Kubrick and
Steven Spielberg offered with his own awesome visions, that make this movie
so utterly amazing.
First, credit the film for not wasting anytime getting started. The only
scene in the entire production that takes place on earth is the obligatory
opening where the heroes bid their families tearful good-byes. The next
setting: Mars, an unlucky 13 months later. Within moments of the four
crewmembers landing, a force like none other sweeps them off their feet and
tears their puny bodies into thousands of pieces (and yes, the
holier-than-now MPAA rated this movie PG!). But the leader, Luc Goddard (Don
Cheadle of Boogie Nights fame), transmits an SOS signal following the
chaotic fiasco - suggesting that he might still be alive. Soon a rescue
mission is underway.
So what happened on the red planet? Well, I don't like to give too much
away, but I will share that the folks over at Disney (Touchstone) assigned
the following tagline to the film: `For centuries we've searched for the
origin of human life on Earth. . .We've been looking on the wrong planet.'
There are plenty of cheesy moments that will give the overly cynical a
reason to chuckle; they won't laugh with the movie, but rather at it.
However, those moments are necessary  this is a true epic. The movie wouldn
't be nearly as powerful, nor as enjoyable, without the hokey romance, last
second saves or dramatic connect-the-dots conclusions.
Perhaps you will see this film and find yourself among its critics. Perhaps
you will snicker with your friends at the overly cheesy moments. Perhaps you
will dismiss its likely huge box office income as being akin to that of
Titanic. Fine. But I challenge you to wake up the next morning and tell me
that you weren't mystified as you lay in bed that night or that this film
hasn't changed the way you look at the stars.

Author
Shane Burridge
I'm surprised at the hostile reaction that Brian De Palma's first foray into 
Sci-Fi has received from some critics.  While purposefully avoiding all 
prior knowledge of the film's content I was still aware of the scathing tone 
of many of its reviews.  Or perhaps it's just that those who would shout 
things down have the louder voices, relegating any more favorable comment to 
the sidelines.
Undeniably, MISSION TO MARS is patchy, but that's nothing new.  De Palma's 
track record is notorious for this kind of spasmodic final product, his most 
unified film THE UNTOUCHABLES being an exception.  At the other end of the 
scale, THE BONFIRE OF THE VANITIES has been his biggest flop, but even then 
it's still okay as a film: it's only when compared to Tom Wolfe's terrific 
book that it fails.  It's these comparative elements that may have irked 
many a reviewer of MISSION TO MARS.  The most obvious homage/ripoff (take 
your pick) is 2001: A SPACE ODYSSEY, and De Palma's beautiful visuals (of 
artificial-gravity; the seemingly effortless, assured camerawork in the 
spacecraft; the figures in Martian orbit) evoke a sense of wonder and easily 
hold their own against that classic.  Conceptwise, it's another matter.  
Science Fiction has been all but milked dry (the last new big thing was 
William Gibson's notions of cyberspace), and when MISSION TO MARS makes it 
clear that it's heading towards a revelatory punchline it can only mean 
trouble.  There's very little left that's new, and I can see film's payoff 
causing SF buffs to roll their eyes and say `they did this in (insert name 
of book/film/TWILIGHT ZONE episode) already!'.
That leaves us with structure, and once again De Palma has shown that he is 
a craftsman of bravura set-pieces.  It's also reminded us that a lot of the 
stuff between those set-pieces doesn't hold together so well, and in MISSION 
TO MARS you can start picking at exact moments where the seams start to 
show.  On the negative side, the opening earthbound scenes appear to have 
been written from The Screenwriter's Guide to Expository Dialogue' (it's a 
made-up title; don't look for it);  the image of the alien at the end is 
embarrassingly twee; De Palma doesn't really know how to use music 
effectively in emotional/dramatic scenes  he seems to have used Ennio 
Morricone's score in much the same way that he overstated his Pino Donaggio 
scores to kitschy effect in his early thrillers; and the storyline is cut 
into two uneven halves, the first being realistic, the second being 
fantastic.
I don't necessarily regard this last criticism as a failing point; in fact I 
enjoy scripts that aren't straitjacketed into arcs' or formulas.  Also  
and in spite of those weak opening scenes  the tone of this film is unlike 
any other De Palma has made.  For once he presents his characters as if they 
were more than scripted pawns in a screenplay; as astronauts, Tim Robbins, 
Connie Nielsen, Gary Sinese, and Jerry O'Connell have an easy, natural bond. 
  And this time, when someone dies in a De Palma film, it resonates.  For my 
money, the pluses in MISSION TO MARS easily outweigh the minuses.  It looks 
fabulous on a big screen, plays out some great sequences, and has a genial 
mix of science and fiction.  Granted, there are several little stupid 
moments scattered throughout, but this at least may provide some 
post-screening entertainment if you see it with a group of friends (my vote 
for The Stupidest Bit is that dumb scene where the rescue team pauses to 
unearth the flag and replant itpersonally my priority upon reaching the 
objective of a six-month mission would have been to get inside the damned 
ship first).
It comes back to what I've always advocated - that the less you know about a 
film beforehand the better.  My guess is that the reviewers who have carped 
most about De Palma's film will be those who either felt he wasn't equipped 
to work in the genre in the first place, or those who were led to expect an 
entirely different experience.  Another 2001?  Not likely; there will hardly 
be another of those in our lifetime.  CLOSE ENCOUNTERS?  No, that was 
pointedly one director's personal vision. APOLLO 13?  No, that was fact, and 
this is fiction.  MISSION TO MARS is.well, it's just MISSION TO MARS and 
that's all there is to it.  In the meantime, and until studios realize that 
hype is the worst enemy a movie can have, you would be best to take a leaf 
out of Alexander Pope's book and maintain a little ignorance before you buy 
your tickets.  Or to put it another way: the best way to watch a film is in 
the dark.
Postscript: It's reassuring to know that in the year 2020 the Dr Pepper logo 
will still remain the same.


Author
Stephen Graham Jones
Mission to Mars: Houston, we have a problem
Aliens taught us that in space, no one can hear you scream. Mission to Mars
teaches us something a little closer to home: that in the theatre, everyone
can hear you scream. That's about the only fitting response to something
like this, though. Quite simply, Mission to Mars played a lot better as a
trailer--where things don't have to make sense--than full-length. It does
have one cool effects shot (that dust tornado), but other than that it's
just Contact and Total Recall meet 2001 and Sphere at Apollo 13's pad and
sit down to watch some Abyss. And not even the director's version, either.
Not that they pay much attention, anyway . . .
The year is 2020. We know this because the Isuzu's look different. And the
mission is of course that first jump to the red planet. Remember all the
hoopla a year or two back about the 'face' on Mars? It matters here. First,
however, there's months and years of getting there. Though all the time in
between is taken care of with subtitles ("X months later," etc), once the
dialogue starts trying to account for that missing time, it'll feel like
years. Clunky, contrived--the same kind of bad-idea lines Double Jeopardy
required to 'account' for Ashley Judd's time in prison. Mission to Mars
could have seriously benefited from condensing the action down to a day or
two, then presenting the rest out of order. We are a sophisticated audience,
after all; we can make sense, don't need everything laid out in obvious
cause and effect order.
Too, and in large part due to all the forecasting which results from
presenting everything in 1-2-3 fashion, it's not at all difficult to figure
out who's dying here, who's staying where, all that. I mean, even without
Mission to Mars, lots of the developments are cliché by now: did the captain
not die in Supernova, in Pitch Black? was it a good idea in Event Horizon to
send a grieving spouse into deep space? In addition, all the warm-fuzzy
parts of Mission to Mars are cloying, to say the least: zero-grav dances,
watching old home movies (per Strange Days), heart-to-hearts with the
director of operations, a wholly ridiculous raising-the-flag scene, all
that. It doesn't help any that these space-shuttles which the crew inhabits
for long long months don't look all that lived in, as Ridley Scott might
have done, but instead look as sterile as ever.
But that face: is it, as the trailer strongly intimates, our alien
ancestors? When we first see it, yes, it does look cool enough to carry us
over all the other already-apparent flaws in the movie. The problem is, it
just doesn't really get any cooler, ever. I mean, yeah, our 'worthy'
survivors here do eventually get inside, but, instead of having that jack up
the action any, it's a long releases of tension. Now we know everyone's
going to be OK. All that's necessary is the movie has to end for fifteen
minutes, fifteen minutes which includes an ill-advised alien (long-finger,
crying, a little too benign?) and a really bad answering-machine joke. And
this is a movie which includes talent like Gary Sinise, Tim Robbins, Armin
Mueller-Stahl? Regrettably, yes. To their credit, their performances are of
course nothing less than we'd expect, it's just that what they're performing
is perhaps the weakest space-movie to come along in a while. Including the
direct-to-video slasher-in-space stuff. The one good thing about Mission to
Mars is that DePalma finally rolls the credits at some arbitrary point, and
you can leave. If you were careful, too, your fond memories of 2001 will
still be intact. Mission to Mars is forgettable enough that that shouldn't
be a problem.
(c)2000 Stephen Graham Jones, http://www.cinemuck.com

Author
Ross Anthony
What just happened on screen? Here's the best I can make of it: a rather
B-script with some G-force actors.
In a ten-minute, backyard-BBQ, introductory scene (here on Earth), we meet
the astronauts and their families via some gratuitous, expository
relationship background and goodbyes. The next thing we know, these folks
are on the red planet. "Mission to Mars" is not about getting there. It's
about salvaging the mission of the crew that meets with a rather unexpected,
unexplainable catastrophe while hanging out collecting rocks one day.
Basically, an upside-down tornado slowly builds up force just meters in
front of the four earthlings. Yet, they stand calmly as the martian stones
between their feet are pulled forward then thrust a kilometer into the
atmosphere. What were they thinking? Turn and run to the ship, you silly
mammals!
>From there, the rest of the film is a rescue mission launched off of the
World Space Station as it floats around the solar system.
The humans in their little white suits seem projected onto this man-made
Mars backdrop, space, or spacecraft -- kind of like Dorothy's gang in OZ.
The special effects are garden-variety: most fine to midland, some cheesy,
some impressive. A centrifugal gravity chamber of the rescue craft is very
nicely simulated. The suits are convincing, but space movies love to put
lights inside the astronauts' helmets. It's dark in space, do they really
think space-pioneers would appreciate penlights three inches from their
cheekbones shining into their eyeballs? Nope, but it sure looks good on
film. Lastly, fossil fuels in deep space in the year 2020? Doubtful.
Tim Robbins' presence is the only perfect thing about the film. Gary
Sinise's performance is also solid.
The producer quips, "If we've done our jobs right we'll be one big
advertisement for continuation of human space explorations." Hopefully
that's true, but concerning claims of advertisement, "Mission to Mars" shows
no shame in selling "space" to cola and candy products.
Though a few well-delivered one-liners tickled this audience, there were
equally as many embarrassingly unintentional gut-busters. Adequately
compelling, you may find the hokey "Mission to Mars" slightly insulting to
your adult intellect. However, the patient 10-year-old might just worship
this movie (if any exist).
FYI: Mars is visible to the naked eye in the night sky and it really is red.
Mission to Mars. Copyright Š 2000. Rated PG.
Starring Gary Sinise, Tim Robbins, Don Cheadle, Connie Nielsen, Jerry
O'Connell, Peter Outerbridge, Kavan Smith, Jill Teed, Elise Neal, Kim
Delaney.
Directed by Brian De Palma.
Screenplay by Jim Thomas and John Thomas.
Produced by Tom Jacobson at Touchstone.
Grade..........................B-
--
Copyright Š 2000. Ross Anthony, currently based in Los Angeles, has scripted
and shot documentaries, music videos, and shorts in 35 countries across
North America, Europe, Africa and Asia. For more reviews visit:
http://RossAnthony.com

Author
John Carroll
A review by John Carroll for MISSION TO MARS (2000).
MISSION TO MARS, starring Gary Sinise, Don Cheadle, Connie Nielsen, Jerry
O'Connell, Kim Delaney, Tim Robbins, Elise Neal and Jill Teed.  Directed by
Brian De Palma.  2000.
   Back in 1968, 2001: A Space Odyssey challenged the thought process of all
film-goers.  Stanley Kubrick's masterpiece was hard to understand, until the
end.  It all made sense.  While sitting through Mission to Mars, those who have
seen 2001 beforehand may be expecting the same type of ending.  While the film
does heat up in interest near the end, Mission to Mars still disappoints.
   Brian De Palma really screwed this one up.  Really.  Mission to Mars could
have been many things.  First and foremost, a wonderful popcorn flick with
top-notch graphics and tense moments that could bring the chills of Apollo 13. 
On the other hand, it could have been a great character drama focusing on the
groundbreaking experience of a mission to Mars, and the tremendous pressure of
such a mission.  Or finally, it could have been a mental challenge the likes of
2001.  Instead, De Palma tries to throw in a touch of each, and what he comes
up with is an average film, but considering all of the high possibilities, an
ultimately disappointing one.
   Mission to Mars seems to have three different plots, each corresponding to
the genres stated above.  Separate, the plots would work great.  Put together,
they are absurd.  The overview of Mission to Mars is as follows: Luc Goddard
(Don Cheadle) is leading the first mission to Mars, and the first mission to
land on Mars.  They land, but while inspecting a mountain of rock, a force
generates and strikes from the top.  The entire first crew, excluding Goddard,
is killed.  Did I just ruin a part of the film?  No.  De Palma accomplishes
this in the first ten minutes.  In fact, I already had a question: Wouldn't a
mission to Mars be the talk of not only the United States, but the WHOLE
WORLD?!?  De Palma does not show a launch, the furor of the world, or any
preparations.  All we see is a birthday song to Jim McConnell (Gary Sinise),
the original captain who was scrapped after the death of his wife, and then
'voila' they are on Mars.
   The plot(s) are absurd, but the casting was so perfect that you just want to
believe.  In fact, the cast may be the only aspect of Mission to Mars that
keeps you from leaving during the first hour.  Gary Sinise and Don Cheadle, two
of the most underrated actors in Hollywood, try their best with what they are
given, but the age old lesson is that you cannot do much if you are not given
anything.  De Palma just seems to try and pay homage to sci-fi films of the
days of yore, but insteads he just insults the whole genre by ruining a film of
such great potential.
   To continue this pointless plot, the 'Face of Mars' develops after the
carnage that ruined the first mission.  The rushing of this segment was
horrible, but gave me hope that De Palma was rushing to get to some great
things in the future of the film.  Therefore, a rescue mission is planned.  For
some odd reason, the whole crew is absolutely positive that Luc is alive, and
have no question that he will be once they get there -- over a year later. 
Doubts arise on the rescue mission, but they forge ahead.  I will not spoil
what happens next, but let's just say that De Palma makes a TON of assumptions
for the future of the space program.  The film still drags.  Finally, they get
to Mars.
   When the second crew reaches Mars, De Palma hints at what Mission to Mars
could have been.  Was it an accident?  The way the rest of this film plays, it
probably was.  The film finally hints at other life on Mars, other forms of
habitation.  It may seem absurd, but all sci-fi movies cannot be factually
correct.  This ending segment of the film probes the possibility of life on
other planets, and how similar that life may be.  De Palma takes a different
look than 2001, but once again ruins it.  Kubrick put 2001 all out on the table
and let the audience decide.  De Palma attempts to challenge the viewer and
then in either a stupid decision by him -- or a forced one from studio execs --
has his actors explain everything right after bringing it up.
   At this point, Mission to Mars is all wrapped up in a nice package, although
the package itself is horrible.  Thoughts are brought up, then quickly
explained, alienating the audience completely.  If you want to see this movie,
your pay-off comes at the end.  Goddard, McConnell and Terri Fisher (Connie
Nielsen) enter the 'Face of Mars.'  This segment is absolutely beautiful.  The
effects prior to this is Mission to Mars were good, but limited.  In all
actuality, Mars is like a desert.  While it may take a great amount of effects
and work in front of a green screen, the pay-off is not as good, as say palace
in The Phantom Menace.  However, the 'Face of Mars' and its simplistic holdings
are beautiful.  This phase of the film is wonderful, challenging the life
process and if we are truly alone in the universe.  The pay-off?  Horrible. 
Once again, De Palma goes to an underdeveloped part of the film (in this case,
McConell's deceased wife) and goes for the sentimental touch.  It may have
payed off, but De Palma never went in-depth to the relationship between the
two, or the psychological trauma at her death.  Instead, he feels he is
justified in getting sentiment just because she is dead.  It may work on some
people, but the majority of audiences will feel cheated at such a terrible
ending -- especially since it follows the one extremely enjoyable experience of
Mission to Mars which hinted at what Mission to Mars could have been.
   Mission to Mars tries to be an epic, but obviously comes up short from
everything previous.  However, my one true peeve from this was the film score. 
Fortunately, De Palma did not try to hire big bands to supply the music. 
However, after hearing the corny music (unfortunately for me, there is no other
better way to put it) I would have rather heard the characters spout pure
gibberish just to talk over the innane music.
   When all is said and done, Brian De Palma comes to fault for the debacle
known as Mission to Mars.  Instead of focusing on one aspect of the sci-fi
genre (effects, character drama or challenging thoughts) he tries to do all
three.  Stabley Kubrick was able to pull this off with 2001, but not even De
Palma can be stupid enough to see himself as Stanley Kubrick.  Mission to
Mars's cast hints at what this film could have been, but they cannot rewrite
the script.  The Mission to Mars is mediocre, at best, but 'The Face of Mars'
salvages what is left.  Here's crossing my fingers for Red Planet.
The Movie Page- http://moviepage.hypermart.net/
Reviews, Previews, News and So Much More!

Author
Walter Frith
Cast - Gary Sinise, Don Cheadle, Connie Nielsen, Jerry O' Connell and Tim
Robbins.
Directed by - Brian De Palma
Written by - Lowell Cannon, Jim Thomas, John Thomas, Graham Yost
Produced by - Tom Jacobson
(Rating) > Motion Picture Association of America - PG (Parental Guidance) /
Rated PG for sci-fi violence and mild language.
(Rating) > Ontario Film Review Board - PG (Parental Guidance) / Rated PG.
May offend some.  Frightening scenes.
Running Length - 110 minutes.
Distributor - Touchstone Pictures.
Brian De Palma.  A man I have trouble accepting as a film director.  Michael
Cimino wins the Oscar for directing 'The Deer Hunter' in 1978 and then flops
big time with 'Heaven's Gate', takes time off to recover and then is given
the opportunity to direct 1985's 'Year of the Dragon' and then he is all but
forgotten with the exception of only a few minor films since then.  De Palma
gets huge budgets for his films and flops at almost every single one of
them.  HOW DOES THIS MAN CONTINUE TO WORK IN HOLLYWOOD?
This can only be truly understood by the film buff who shakes his or her
head in
disbelief whenever a Brian De Palma film comes out.  De Palma just doesn't
understand sub text.  His films all have long static tracking shots of no
interest and
his films move along usually at the pace of being stuck in a traffic jam.
'Mission to Mars' has all of the ingredients of a Brian De Palma film
without the usual trait of trying to copy Alfred Hitchcock.
It is 2020 and people are still the same.  They live in houses, have kids,
barbecues, drink beer and appreciate their friendships.  Jim McConnell (Gary
Sinise) is a man still suffering the loss of his spouse.  Luke Graham (Don
Cheadle) is the captain of the first human exploration to the red planet,
Mars.  Jim and Luke take Woody Blake and Terry Fisher (Tim Robbins and
Connie Nielsen) and Phil Ohlmyer (Jerry O'Connell) and a couple of other
astronauts with them.  The space frontier holds many mysteries and NASA has
lost probes near Mars before so who knows if an exploration of Mars should
ever be attempted.  Some believe that a cosmic whirlwind or some other
scientific force caused particles from Mars to drift to Earth and that our
ancestry and entire life force is indeed Martian in nature and this is what
'Mission to Mars' tries to explain with an "in your FACE" style of
presentation.  You'll know what I mean by the quotation marks and capital
letters after you've seen the film.
Luke and some others explore Mars and all are killed except for Luke and a
rescue mission begins to find them.  This is the first major problem the
film has and it's a problem I had with Oliver Stone's 'Born on the Fourth of
July' in 1989.  We go from one normal scene to a completely different one
without any transition in viewing it.  In the case of Stone's film, it
showed Tom Cruise from his rainy prom night to his immediate tour of duty in
Vietnam.  'Mission to Mars' goes from Earth quickly to the mission without
showing us anything about the departure from our world.  A film needs a send
off like the launching of Apollo 13 in the film of the same name from 1995.
1997's 'Contact' had the major blast off shown in quite a different way but
at least it was there.  You simply can't get an audience fully interested in
your main frame of story telling if you don't show them how they get there
in order to know where they're going next.
There is one totally tedious part of 'Mission to Mars' where a space walk
takes place in order to retrieve a craft and one of the rescue crew dies and
it is one of the most boring things you will ever see on film.  In 1984's
'2010', we see two astronauts about to board the Discovery.  One is American
and one is Russian.  The space walk is quick, timed perfectly with
reflective dialogue of their situation along the way.  There are no long
shots that go on and on and on.  De Palma had me looking at my watch several
times during this scene and during the film in general.
The performances in this film are nothing to rave about either.  They are
standard, lack depth and have only a flurry of interest towards the end of
the film.  The film also has a problem with theories and proof of
geographical origins such as the notion of continental drift.  Many of the
insights the film projects about the world we know of make us say, "Okay,
I've known or suspected that for sometime.  Why can't this movie create a
situation or theory I can think about long after I leave the theatre."
Isn't that the point of most good science fiction?
About the only thing I liked in 'Mission to Mars' were the visuals and the
fact that the film did run under two hours, thank God.  It really looked and
felt like Mars and being partial to a good soundtrack, the film had many
sound effects that provided much needed ear candy and the eye candy helped
out a great deal.  The film sort of feels like ordering from a menu in a
restaurant and upon finding out that they don't have your meal on the menu,
you settle for second best and comment that although you didn't get what you
wanted, it was still pretty good.  De Palma does deserve some credit for
this film which is better in its second half but it still is a far cry from
good science fiction, which playing second fiddle to comedy, is the hardest
thing to pull off successfully in motion pictures.  Let's hope that De Palma
doesn't try to be (intentionally) funny anytime soon.
A film must receive a three star rating or higher to be eligible for a
recommendation.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Author
Marty Mapes
I know you look at sci-fi movies with a skeptical eye. If the science is
wrong because of lazy screenwriters, you get mad. That's why I recommend
you don't go see MISSION TO MARS.
M2M is set 20 years in the future. Budweiser comes in waxed cardboard
boxes, Isuzu builds a single-seat SUV, internal combustion engines are a
thing of the past, and NASA is sending the first manned mission to Mars.
After a quick introduction to the astronauts and their families, the
movie jumps ahead one year, where the first Martian explorers are doing
some radar mapping. While investigating a possible source of water, the
crew notices the wind start to blow. Soon the wind forms into a giant
worm-like dust vortex, which swallows the crew. Earth can't tell what
happened, but because of one last desperate signal, it knows three of
the four astronauts are dead.
Richard, I know you're going to see this anyway. At least there are some
good qualities to it
There are graceful, dizzying scenes of zero-g life onboard and outside
the rescue ship. Cinematography, direction, and special effects really
came together to produce some beautiful three-dimensional motion.
Backing up the great visuals was some impeccable sound editing. In two
different scenes the camera circles a room, and the sound of a person's
voice or of music circles with it. Home theater DVD geeks will go crazy
for this movie.
In addition, the screenplay (written by Jim Thomas, John Thomas and
Graham Yost) makes an incredibly bold decision that caught me completely
by surprise. Naturally, I can't say what it is, but it earned some extra
points for its gutsiness.
But the movie's science is going to make you mad. One scene crucial to
the plot cannot happen. It involves something from the ship drifting
back behind it. It's a situation that would only happen if the ship were
accelerating, which it isn't. We know it isn't because one of the
astronauts just came in from a space walk, and HE didn't drift back.  
Another part that won't work for you involves DNA. In fact, a LOT of
stupid things are said about DNA. Since the movie's climax hinges on the
specifics, I won't go into detail. However, I CAN repeat a quote for you
that illustrates my point. After glancing at a few dozen protein pairs
on a computer model, one of the astronauts says "That DNA looks human!"
Finally, with your background in ethics, I think you will dislike the
secret behind the dust vortex. The movie tells us why it's there, but
the reason it gives doesn't fit with the rest of what we learn. I won't
say too much now, but when the movie is over and you think about it,
you'll be disappointed. 
But even WITHOUT the flaws in science and ethics, M2M is really not a
very good movie. There were two corny scenes of exposition that were
almost intolerably bad. The first happens at the beginning when Jim
(Gary Sinise), sharing an emotional moment with the guys, brings up his
dead wife. The second happens when Jim and Woody (Tim Robbins) put
together their rescue plan, sounding like some 8-year-old's idea of a
heroic spaceman.
The film's payoff was equally bad. After taking us on a journey across
millions of miles, the movie ends with an idea that is neither original,
nor exciting, nor thought-provoking. In fact, if you've seen a few
trailers, then you've seen just about everything.
But I'm sure you'll go see it for yourself anyway. If and when you do,
drop me a line and let me know what you thought. I say it a
disappointment, but I'm not sorry I saw it.
Hope all is well with you. Give my best to your wife.

Author
Berge Garabedian
For more reviews and movie news, visit http://www.joblo.com/
So what do you get when you mix together plot elements from various
successful sci-fi films such as CLOSE ENCOUNTERS OF THE THIRD KIND, 2001: A
SPACE ODYSSEY, APOLLO 13 and CONTACT? Well, whatever it is, you'd sure as
hell hope that it would be a thousand times better than this shoddy attempt
at such a melange, considering the disastrous results we're left with here.
This is a film that takes a little bit of everything, but ultimately adds up
to a lot of nothing! It's like I said...this movie sucks.
PLOT:
A rescue crew of astronauts is sent down to Mars in the year 2020, after an
unknown energy force leads to a loss of contact with the previous gang of
space aviators to visit the red planet.
CRITIQUE:
Extremely underwhelming is the best way to describe this movie. Uneven,
would be another. The trailer for this movie actually showed some promise,
the buzz around it had been so-so, and even the film itself starts off with
a decent first twenty minutes, all leading you to believe that it's actually
going to go "somewhere". But it isn't long before the entire movie
downshifts into neutral, features more space walks than anything interesting
on the cherry-colored planet, tries too hard to get us into the "pain" of
some its characters and unsuccessfully tosses some romance into the mix. In
a sci-fi movie? Well, I don't know, much of it just seemed like a bunch of
nerdies talking techie jargon for about an hour and a half, only to figure
out some big secret in the end, a secret which practically had me yawning
with excitement. Ultimately, this is a movie that starts off with a decent
premise, joins the crew in their "misadventures in space" for the main crux
of its journey, and eventually settles down for one of the most
anti-climactic endings this side of CONTACT. Mind you, if you enjoyed that
film's shrug-of-the-shoulders ending, you might just enjoy this frivolous
ditty as well. Of course, I don't remember CONTACT having such obvious and
painfully distracting computer generated effects at its end of story. Ugh.
What a friggin' mess.
Films like this generally get me wondering about the brass in Hollywood
again. Didn't anybody recognize the crappiness in this script? Didn't they
read the bad dialogue, the cheezy lines, the obvious derivative nature of
the work (Mind you, with a director like DePalma at the helm, that ain't
saying much!). Of course, you can't really blame the brass for the inclusion
of Jerry O'Connell in this fine crew of thespians. 'Nuff said. Neither can
you blame them for DePalma cranking up the juice on the film's musical score
during the last fifteen minutes, presumably in order to wake the audience up
(Okay, we get it Brian, this scene is supposed to be
powerful...wow...yawn...my ears hurt!). So is anything salvageable in this
movie? Sure. Gary Sinise does another great job, as does Cheadle, the film
doesn't completely bore you as much as it just moves along slowly without
anything really interesting happening, and yes, the "sand-twister" effect
that you see in the commercial is well done. Other than that? I guess I
could say that I admire how filmmakers have become so much more devious in
their product placement strategies...oops, did I say "admire", I meant "am
disgusted"! All in all, this movie delivers very little in actual substance,
offers two-bit dialogue masked in a lot of sci-fi mumbo-jumbo, pretends to
be deep when really it's just sappy, and eventually just settles into an
ending which, other than presenting us with a pathetic computer graphic as a
part of the story, gives us little more to think about than how we might be
able to get our money back for sitting through this rehashed dreck. Go see
THE NINTH GATE...now there's a great movie!
And on a personal note, I think it's time for DePalma to stop worrying so
much about his proverbial 12-minute uninterrupted film sequences, and start
worrying more about how crappy his movies are getting.

Author
Rose 'Bams' Cooper
Mission To Mars (2000) 
Rated PG; running time 113 minutes
Genre: Science Fiction
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0183523 
Official site: http://movies.go.com/m2m/  
Written by: Jim Thomas (based on a story by Lowell Cannon)
Directed by: Brian De Palma
Starring: Gary Sinise, Don Cheadle, Connie Nielsen, Tim Robbins, 
Jerry O'Connell, Kim Delaney
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2000
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamsmission.html
It was an odd coincidence that the first trailers for "Mission To Mars" 
came out right around the time when NASA's Mars Lunar module got lost in 
space.  It was almost a joke (although at $165 million, not a very funny 
joke) at the time, that "Mission" had as much a chance to succeed as 
that failed space mission did.  And though it took first place in its 
first weekend, a lot of reviewers said that, as a movie, it was a 
critical failure.  What does Yours Truly say?  Well, I reckon you'll 
have to read on to find out.
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**):
Beginning in the year 2020, Mission Commander Luke Goddard (Don Cheadle) 
prepares, with the support of friends and fellow astronauts Woody Blake 
(Tim Robbins), Woody's wife, Dr. Terri Fisher (Connie Nielsen), 
scientist Phil Ohlmyer (Jerry O'Connell) and "stick jockey" Jim 
McConnell (Gary Sinise), for an historic mission: the first manned 
mission from Earth to Mars.  But when a "mysterious force" causes a 
disaster on Mars, stranding Luke and possibly his team, his support team 
sets off from Earth on a rescue mission that puts them in as much risk 
as those they're attempting to bring back.
-Except for two specific pieces of music (the opening Zydeco piece, and 
the Van Halen "dance" number), the background music was truly awful.  
Whoever came up with the bright idea to have Cheesy Organ Music 
throbbing in the background, should be taken out behind the woodshed and 
severely scolded - just before they're dropkicked right out of the movie 
business.  
-If this movie is any indication, future space missions will be 
commercial-laden: "product placement" takes on a whole new meaning when 
your brand name is written in great big letters along the side of a 
rocketship.
Ok, actually, make that three things I noticed right off: the third 
being the genuine "closeness" I perceived between the characters.  I 
know I said pretty much the same thing in my "What Planet Are You From?" 
review, but the feeling of real camaraderie struck me even harder here.  
Struck me so hard, in fact, it moved me to tears at one point (you'll 
know the point when you see the movie).  
There have been real-world scientists, along with not a few laymen and 
movie critics, who've taken "Mission" to task for where it went wrong; 
but there have been just as many who've praised it for where the movie 
got the science, and the story, right.  I fall squarely in the latter 
camp.  I don't know from physics, or whether an orbit around Mars should 
be asynchronous or bsynchronous; but I do know a well-told, heartfelt 
story when I see one, and that's what I saw during the 113 minutes of 
"Mission".  True, it had its flaws; it often got thick on the melodrama, 
and Kim Delaney (playing Jim's dead wife Maggie, via home movies) proved 
herself once again to be a fifth wheel in the presence of much greater 
actors.  And did I mention that godawful music?
But I easily looked past its flaws and saw the essential human story it 
told.  I found the tight-knit group of characters entirely believable, 
got a warm 'n fuzzy feeling from watching their interactions, and was 
simply blinded - in a good way - by the science of it all.  The special 
effects were brilliant, but not so-much-so that they overwhelmed the 
story itself.  And I still can't speak of the spacewalk scene without 
feeling a lump in my throat.
After his terrible miscalculation in "Reindeer Games", I was heartened 
to see Sinise bounce back so strongly here.  Cheadle's performance was 
likewise strong [and you know I gotta feature him in the "Black Factor" 
below], O'Connell was humorous but not stupidly so, and though Nielsen 
suffered by comparison in her "alone" scenes, her chemistry with Robbins 
was right on the money; they made a great couple, and I'd love to see 
them act in something together again. 
Will we Earthers really reach Mars by 2020?  Well, we missed the "Space 
1999" deadline already, and a lot of "futuristic" movies and TV series 
of the past will soon be shown to have been a little more optimistic of 
the advancement of the human race than we've proven ourselves to be 
capable of thus far.  But the question for me is not so much "Will we 
get out there?", or even "Who else will we find when we do?" - but 
instead, "What will we do about each other *here*?"
The "Black Factor"  [ObDisclaimer: We Are Not A Monolith]:
"Mission Commander Luke Goddard, played by Don Cheadle".  Man, do I love 
typing that.  A powerful actor whose "quietness" almost - but not quite 
- masks his incredible acting abilities (c.f. "Devil In A Blue Dress"), 
he succeeded where Angela Bassett failed in the dreadful "Supernova" 
earlier this year: neither making his "Blackness" pronounced, nor 
putting it away in shame, Cheadle, through Luke, built on the legacy of 
a very few Black actors who've slowly chipped away at that old 
stereotype (began with "Logan's Run", I believe; correct me if I'm 
wrong) that the Black "race" won't survive in any meaningful way, into 
the future.  Cheadle joins a chosen few in making space, on the Silver 
Screen, "safe" for Black Folk again.
Bammer's Bottom Line:
While no "The Right Stuff", "Mission" had its heart in the right place.  
And the way I see it, "heart" is what propelled it well out of the 
lesser orbit of that other dramatic space flick of 2000...uh, y'all know 
the one I mean.  I just can't bring myself to type the name of that most 
dreadful collection of frames of moving images running swiftly together 
which would normally be called "film" but could not by any stretch of 
the imagination be honoured with such a label, so soon after I've eaten.
"Mission To Mars" (rating: greenlight): 
This flick did what even the noteworthy "The Green Mile" couldn't do: it 
made me cry.  And for all its flaws, that goes a long way towards 
proving its worth, in my book.

Author
W. Keith Work
Take every science fiction or NASA cliché and pack them all into a
movie about Gary Sinise staring longingly at films of his dead wife
and you'll have Mission to Mars. 
>From the opening scene, I knew something was dreadfully wrong. We
start at the going away party from The Right Stuff where astronauts
poke fun at each other's piloting skills just to prove how cool they
are. The NASA wives are there grousing around their barbecue. Cut to
the scene in Apollo 13 where daddy explains to his boy how far away
Mars is and how long it takes to get there. We're introduced to the
characters (just like it says in Script Writing for Dummies) - the
token black guy (Don Cheadle), the grizzled captain (Tim Robbins), the
grounded ace just dying to get back in the saddle (Gary Sinise), etc,
etc... You've seen them all before. And the intro wraps up with
Robbins giving a heartfelt "Godspeed." He actually says it. Then
Cheadle goes to Mars (which looks exactly like a Hollywood set -
perfect lighting and all) where the crew watches calmly while a
tornado looks around and sucks them in. Hallelujah the first act is
over. 
The second consists of a series of completely contrived and highly
improbable difficulties that serve no purpose whatsoever. On the
rescue trip, we encounter the floating blood from Star Trek as well as
that strange dramatic device known as 'jargon.' Incomprehensible
technical problems are put before the audience and we're told it's
highly risky and may not work! Then we're told it did and we should be
happy and feel closer to the characters as a result. We also get
treated to a 20 minute musical montage every time a character has a
bad thought. Sinise's wife is dead and he, traveling with a married
couple to further deepen his depression, insists on watching every
home movie of her that he owns. Where did they get the payload
capacity for all this ridiculous sentimentalism? After this we're
witness to one of those scenes that's so laughable it's almost worth
the price of admission - four astronauts free floating through space
on what is obviously a set piece while they all line up perfectly like
conga dancers for one of those 50's space movie stills. 
Finally, they arrive and spend hours dragging a pack through the sand
instead of finding their missing crew. Once he is found they
investigate the source of the tornado thing from earlier and rip off
2001 in an effort at more preachy sentimentalism. The alien actually
sheds a single tear! Then they finally add even more insult to the
injury they've put us through when Sinise has some hoaky religious
experience while his life flashes before his eyes. The final rip off
is from Close Encounters, but I'll spare you. 
God only knows how this film got made. And with big names too. Suffice
it to say that I saw this one so you don't have to. 
To reply via email, remove "SPAMMENOT" from the address.

Author
Greg King
MISSION TO MARS (M).  
(Hollywood Pictures/Buena Vista International)
Director: Brian De Palma
stars: Gary Sinise, Tim Robbins, Jerry O'Connell, Connie Nielsen, Don 
Cheadle, Armin Mueller-Stahl (uncredited)
running time: 113 minutes.
A poor man's 2001?  Despite having a larger budget than
Stanley Kubrick and access to more modern technology, Brian De Palma's
sci-fi thriller about the first manned space mission to Mars seems
disappointingly second rate.
In the year 2020, NASA sends the first manned space mission to
explore the surface of Mars.  But when an inexplicable disaster wipes
out the crew, a hastily assembled rescue mission is launched.
Astronauts Gary Sinise, Tim Robbins and Jerry O'Connell (from Sliders,
etc) lead the mission under the watchful eye of an uncredited Armin
Mueller-Stahl.  Even their mission does not proceed smoothly as a
variety of disasters befall them before they uncover the secret of
what happened to the first landing crew.  They also encounter
intelligent alien life and learn the secret of life on earth.
Something of a cross between Chariots Of the Gods, Close Encounters Of
The Third Kind and 2001: A Space Odyssey, Mission To Mars aims to be
more of a serious sci-fi adventure exploring grand themes rather than
the typical action film with spectacular space battles and exploding
death stars.  This leads to some rather boring moments throughout that
will test the patience of many within the audience.
The script, from Jim and John Thomas (Predator, etc) and
Graham Yost (Speed, etc), occasionally becomes laden with excessive
jingoism and schmaltz.  The special effects are sometimes quite
impressive, and the visual effects from the ILM team are stunning. It
is obvious that De Palma and his production crew have studied
Kubrick's classic, as some elements here (such as the revolving
spaceships) echo 2001.  They get the nuts and bolts and intricate
technical details of space travel right.  But the brilliant visuals
are small compensation for the overall lack of pace and excitement.
De Palma's direction here lacks his usual intensity, and it seems as
if he is uncomfortable with the demands of a special effects driven
film.  Even normally strong performers of the calibre of Sinise and
Robbins seem confused and ultimately defeated by the demands of the
film and the cluttered narrative.
Mission To Mars explores questions regarding the origins of
life on earth, but somehow it lacks the vision, complexity, cinematic
style and sense of extraordinary wonder of Kubrick's seminal classic.

Author
Jered J Floyd
I hardly know where to begin. This movie starts out promising (except
for the glaring product placements from Isuzu, Dr. Pepper, etc.), at a
slow but even-keeled pace to introduce the characters and their
emotional backgrounds. Then everything starts to go wrong.
An exploration team on Mars sets off what appears to be an ancient
booby-trap, almost certainly killing all four members.  Instead of
calmly planning a next move, the team on the World Space Station
swings into action to form an emergency rescue team to leave the next
day, even though it will take 13 months to travel to Mars. Are you
following this logic?
On the way to Mars, the rescue team encounters contrived incident
after contrived incident. An encounter with a micrometeorite field
serves to show that not a single one of the characters is in control
of themselves, let alone remotely qualified to be an astronaut. As
oxygen leaks from their ship, the computer voice announces the falling
oxygen in a slower and slower voice, as somehow this has forced the
ship's computer to fail. I fully expected to begin to hear the strains
of "A Bicycle Built For Two" from the dying computer. With lines like
"Has the reboot sequence been tested? Are you kidding? These computers
are too expensive to test!", screenwriter Jim Thomas shows that he
still has no understanding of technology, even after his last disaster
"Wild Wild West".
Alas, the pain doesn't end there. The script goes on to ignore
biology as well, mysteriously representing DNA as a double helix of
double strands, and bandying around terms like "chromosome" in the
same way that Star Trek uses "tachyon inverter". The plot is barely
sensible; a terrible attempt to capitalize on better SF such as "2001"
and "Contact."
All through the film I grasped at straws to find any redeeming feature
of this film at all. I failed. The many of the graphics were
amateurish by today's standards, and generally did little to advance
the film. The cinematography and direction were utterly nonsensical at
times, even for Brian De Palma.  Incongruous cuts and absurd segues
were the norm.
And then there is the tragedy that was the soundtrack. At its best,
the soundtrack faded into the background. At its worst, it stuck out
like sore thumb pierced by a micrometeorite. From demonic organ music
to frentic oboes to melodramatic harps, this movie had it all...
especially when it least fits in.
The sad thing is, the genre will be judged based on movies like this.
If this movie flops, the studios will claim that there isn't a market
for science fiction, and the genre will suffer just a little bit more.
As a friend commented afterwards, "Howard the Duck" was a better
movie. It was at least trying to be funny.  This movie scores a big
zero from me, not merely on the basis that it was bad, but because
the people responsible have absolutely no excuse. For shame!

Author
Sean Molloy
Mission To Mars (** out of ****)
Starring Gary Sinise, Connie Nielsen, Tim Robbins
Directed By Brian DePalma
Buena Vista Pictures, Rated PG, 2000
Running Time: 1 Hour 53 Minutes
"I'm afraid there's a few things in his movie that couldn't quite
happen. Having people in space take their helmets off is wonderful
drama, but..."
- Buzz Aldrin, commenting on Brian DePalma's latest film Mission To Mars 
Before I begin, I have to admit that I went into Mission To Mars armed
with a fairly sharp bias.  I'm guilty of reading piles of internet
anti-hype and spiteful test-screening reviews.  I am not instilled
with confidence when I hear that instead of showing up to discuss his
film with students at a university's Director's Screening Night, Brian
DePalma sent along a piece of paper bearing the words "Hope you have
fun!"  I'm also guilty of hoping Mission To Mars would end up being
something it did not aim to be - an intelligent and original
science-fiction film.  Everything here has been done before - and done
far better - by films like 2001, Close Encounters, The Abyss and
Contact.  Call this course Intro To Science Fiction, and it's being
added to the curriculum about thirty years too late.
So, I didn't get what I wanted, it's not the first time... instead of
the memorable and thoughtful sci-fi epic I desired, or the flaming
heap of Armageddon-style dung I expected, Brian DePalma has delivered
a beautifully filmed and occasionally effective space melodrama.  The
astronauts on this Mission are the kind that watch videos of their
dead wives, and shed a tear as she stops to deliver a philosophical
soliloquy in the middle of a party.  They speak in exposition,
relaying in movie-science terms the concept of DNA to one another, as
if they think their counterparts didn't graduate from high school.
They clue fellow spacemen and spacewomen in on what exactly the
mission they've been on for thirteen months is.  They have their share
of improbable but undeniably suspenseful close calls and near misses.
Science and logic are freely traded for drama, usually to some degree
of success.  There's a effectively moving moment where a character
removes his helmet in the depths of space... what occurs then on the
screen is far removed from what would have actually happened to the
poor bastard.  Good thing, since the resulting blood-boiling,
explosive mess would probably have marred the dramatic occasion a tad.
I probably would have even shed a tear if the depth of character
development went beyond "is currently involved in a loving
relationship" or "was at one time involved in a loving relationship."
The upshot of this void of personality is that the script thankfully
manages to sidestep the tired introduction of the "crewmember gone
bad."  Not a one of them falls prey to the dreaded disorder of space
dimentia.  Could this be the first space movie to feature a crew that
actually gets along with one another?
The film's greatest strengths are visual ones... Mission To Mars
begins with what appears to be a long, continuous take, exploring a
group of people at a party.  He did the same exact thing at the
beginning of last year's atrocious Snake Eyes, only here, it seems as
if he's just trying to establish it as some sort of DePalma trademark,
because it's absolutely pointless.
The film's second major sequence, however, is an absolute
stunner... the unsuspecting crew of one of the Mars teams (led by Don
Cheadle) accidentally summons up the wrath of the planet itself - if
you've seen a preview for the film, you've probably seen the
snake-like dust funnel.  It's frightening, and it looks fantastic.
And as these events are transpiring on the planet, Mission Control is
monitoring them millions of miles away, twenty minutes after they
actually happen.  It's set up as a potentially nifty story-telling
device, but unfortunately nothing ever really comes of it.
The rest of the film follows the rescue crew as they try to get
themselves to Mars and rescue whoever may have survived... There's
some satisfyingly suspenseful moments as, inevitably, things don't go
quite as planned.  Most of the scenes in space are pretty impressive
technical feats.  DePalma's camera floats and rotates around the
spinning space station with disorienting dexterity, but too often it
looks like he's doing it just to show off.  And the sweeping rocky
vista of Red Planet itself looked, well, just like I'd expect Mars to
look.
As Fozzie Bear used to say, "Getting There Is Half The Fun."
Apparently, he's never been on a mission to Mars...  Alas, once our
intrepid crew arrives on the Red Planet, What They Find When They Get
There is insipid and boring.  Cover your ears if you don't care to
hear this, but I'm not really giving away more than what's in the
trailers... if you've seen a single commercial, I guarantee you
already know how the Mission ends.  I don't know, maybe I've just read
far too many science fiction novels in my time, but for my money,
human DNA is probably the least interesting item on the list of "cool,
exciting things you can find in space."  Mix in "lame computer
animation" and combine it with "overwrought emotional dreck," and now
you know what Mars' limp secret is.
I once played a game on my old Commodore 64 called Zak McKraken and
the Alien Mindbenders.  It was one of Lucasarts' first comic
point-and-click adventures, and it featured astronauts that were
headed off to explore that creepy face structure on Mars, much like
this daring crew.  What they uncovered was a sinister plot concocted
by a race of Alien Elvis Impersonators to make the people of Earth
terminally stupid.

Author
Michael Redman
Maybe this mission should have been scrubbed
There's a world of difference between artists and technicians. The
artist has a vision to create something new. He may not do it well, it
might be sloppy, but it's something you've never seen before. A good
technician can make it look good, but without direction from his own
inner artist or someone else, it's going to be just a Xerox. Obviously
successful films need both skills.
Brian De Palma is a masterful technician. He's spent his career copying
others, most notably Hitchcock. He usually knows exactly what to do to
make a scene work, but only because he has learned it by rote. Aside
from rare flashes of originality, his films are often soul-dead.
In De Palma's latest, he turns his attention to Stanley Kubrick. To tell
the truth, I enjoyed portions of this movie, but I liked it a lot better
over 30 years ago when it was called "2001". I enjoyed it even more when
it was titled "Close Encounters".
NASA has set its sights for Mars. When the first crew meets with
disaster, a rescue mission is sent to the red planet. They don't do so
well either, but eventually meet up the lone surviving
astronaut-gone-Rasta and solve the mysteries of the universe. And it's
all so boring.
There are so many scenes that just don't work, it's difficult to begin.
When the first crew is a few feet away from a raging massive upside-down
Martian tornado (which looks remarkably like a sandworm from "Dune")
destroying everything in its path, they just hang out watching. Error.
The most interesting character (and that's not saying much) is killed
off. Error. The alien is laughable. Error. The rest of the characters
are the dullest people imaginable. Error.
There's some nice eyecandy. The face on Mars, which turns out to be a
giant metal Thai Buddha head, looks cool. A three-dimensional
holographic planetarium is more fun to watch than anything at Disney
World. Maneuvering in space suits outside the ship seems realistic.
But there's so much more that feels as if we've been there before. From
"2001", there's the rotating space station, the blinding white room.
>From "Close Encounters", they solve a sound puzzle and play it to the
aliens. The list goes on.
The actors are mostly mobile wooden statues. Even Gary Sinise and Tim
Robbins can't muster enough emotion to convince us they are breathing.
No one seems to care about anything that happens. You won't either.
The absolutely worst sin is the blatant product placement as Dr. Pepper,
with a 20 foot tall logo, saves the day. They should save the
commercials for those insipid bits before the film.
(Michael Redman has written this column since before Mars was discovered
and if that planet is as exciting as this film, he thinks he'll just
stay home. Email your Martian chronicles to redman@bluemarble.net.)
[This appeared in the 3/16/2000 "Bloomington Independent", Bloomington,
Indiana. Michael Redman can be contacted at redman@bluemarble.net.]
-- 
mailto:redman@bluemarble.net
Film reviews archive: http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Author
Paul-Michael Agapow
A Postview, copyright 2000 by Paul-Michael Agapow.
A heroic crew struggles to rescue a team of astronauts stranded on
Mars, stopping only for product placement and triumphant fanfares.
It has become traditional with every new Brian De Palma film to
tut-tut about how it's not up to his usual standard.  Which brings to
mind the question: Exactly what is De Palma's usual standard?  "Snake
Eyes"?  "Bonfire of the Vanities"?  Now to build on this history of
failed expectations comes Mission to Mars, a Steinbeckian idiot of a
film that smothers any sense in the script with its desperate clammy
grip.
The setup is this: the year is 2020 and Earth is going to Mars.  Of
course, when I say "Earth" I mean "America", just like when the film
says "international effort", they mean "NASA".  Now, Ray Bradbury
wrote about the small-town America going to Mars, with colonists
building homesteads and sitting on their front porches sipping
lemonade.  In contrast, "Mission to Mars" has a bunch of smug,
laddish, middle-class baby boomers going to Mars.  (I say "baby
boomers" but the characters are of course 30 years too young for the
way they dress, talk and the music they listen to.  I say "laddish"
but there are three female characters: one whose main function is to
fret, one that dies twenty minutes into the film and another who dies
before the film even starts.)  What we have here is "2001" as done by
Ron Howard.  Note: this is not a compliment.
But anyway, Earth is going to Mars.  Unfortunately (for the audience)
the first expedition is composed of Z-list actors and is thus doomed
to be wiped out by a mysterious alien artefact.  (Don't you hate it
when that happens?)  So a rescue mission is mounted DR PEPPER and is
entering Martian KAWASAKI orbit when disaster PENZOIL strikes and
their M&MS ship is BUDWEISER struck by SONY meteorites.  BUY MORE
STUFF. "Put on your helmet or you'll embolize!", worries the
femme-astronaut.  At first I thought it was a warning to the audience,
but it turns out the ship is in danger and mission commander Tim
Robbins is making his big bid to escape the script.  (The plucky
little guy looked kinda peaceful at the end, a happy little smile on
his face as he froze to death.)  The chick panics for a while, they
make a crash-landing on Mars and find the lone survivor.  ("Hey, we're
the rescue team!  Uh, you wouldn't have a spare spaceship lying around
would you?")
As bogus as the first part of the film is, it at least shows some grip
of orbit al mechanics and physics.  By contrast, the biology appears
to have been lifted from "Pokemon".  You see, the aliens have left a
secret message for humans, a message that may only be decoded by
someone who has seen "Contact".  The message turns out to be a DNA
sequence that is "missing a chromosome".  (Two possibilities: 1. 
No-one on the team knows anything about biology, or 2.  The
astronauts' confusion over basic molecular biology is due to NASA's
affirmative action policy on hiring the chromosomally challenged.) 
The astronautrix panics for a while, then concludes that if they fill
in the "missing chromosome", the mysterious alien artefact will usher
the astronauts into a really cool planetarium.  This happens. 
(Although surely it would have been a lot simpler and cheaper for NASA
to just send the guys to the Field Museum for the afternoon.)
The basic goofiness of "Mission to Mars" is compounded by lugheaded
dialogue and direction, with characters explaining what they have just
done or are just about to do, and computers helpfully announcing "AT
POINT OF NO RETURN" or "AIR LEVELS FALLING TO 30 PERCENT".  Note
please this is a film that has three names credited for the "story"
and three more for the "screenplay".  This smacks of writers who did
all their research by watching other movies - "Contact", "The Abyss",
"Apollo 13", "Close Encounters", "2001", "Silent Running" - while
watching the Discovery Channel for flavour.  Add in the strident
soundtrack and gobs of pseudoscience and you have a very unhappy
audience.
I'd describe "Mission to Mars" as dull, dumb and shitheaded but that
would be insulting other dull, dumb and shitheaded films.  It's not
even stupid enough to be fun.  It makes one yearn for the intellectual
thrust and parry of Starship Troopers.  [*/misfire] and that long
empty stretch of road north of Port Augusta on the Sid & Nancy scale.

Author
Brian Matherly
*** Warning - The following review contains spoilers ***
Cast: Gary Sinise, Don Cheadle, Connie Nielsen, Jerry O'Connell, Kim
Delaney, Tim Robbins, Elise Neal, Jill Teed, Jody Thompson, Bill Timoney 
Written by: Jim Thomas, John Thomas and Graham Yost 
Directed by: Brian DePalma 
Running Time: 115 minutes 
The first big event movie of 2000 turns out to be anything but.  Gary
Sinise stars as an astronaut who is removed from a Mars mission when his
astronaut wife, Maggie (Kim Delaney), becomes ill and passes away.  Don
Cheadle is then given the mission along with a Russian couple and a
young hotshot.  When a strange whirlwind shot from the top of a Mars
mountain range attacks the crew of the mission, Sinise and Robbins
convince their superior to let them, Neilsen, and O'Connell perform a
rescue mission for whatever crew might be remaining.  What they discover
on the surface of the planet will dramatically change their lives
forever (although no one watching the film will come away profoundly
affected). 
Before I ever saw the film, I was aware of the promotional campaign with
Dr. Pepper.  Every time I would see a bottle of the soft drink, the
Mission to Mars logo was emblazoned upon it.  Little did I know that the
plot would be taking a back seat to the product placement of the drink
and several other products.  Dr. Pepper saves the day at one point, and
a dream sequence/flashback features Jerry O'Connell shoving M&M's in our
face.  These are but a couple of the ridiculous examples of product
placement scattered throughout the film. 
Clichés are also the order of the day with Mission to Mars.  Dialogue
and character motivations are all lifted directly from countless other
science fiction films that have all done it better and with more style
(even Independence Day, which lifted all of IT'S premises from other
sci-fi films was better than this film, and I don't like Independence
Day).  Films like 2001:A Space Odyssey, The Abyss, and Close Encounters
of the Third Kind are all blatantly stolen from (and poorly at that). 
There is even a sequence where a rover is traveling through a canyon,
and I couldn't help but whisper "u'tinni" to myself and wait for a Jawa
to quickly hide in the rocks before the rover could get a glimpse of it. 
This film also features one of my all-time least favorite movie clichés:
the "he would have wanted you to have this" moment, where one character
gives another a trinket that yet another character is established as
constantly having (and is usually made fun of by the character who ends
up getting all sappy over it later on).  Scenes like these always bother
me when they come out of nowhere in regular films, but in a film as
cliché ridden as this, it is particularly irritating. 
Ennio Morricone's music is usually considered to be some of the best
stuff in the projects he works on, but here it is dreadfully
overbearing.  His music sounds like it came straight out of a Vincent
Price movie in certain scenes.  At other times his music is unbearably
over-dramatic.  One sequence involving a daring spacewalk rescue is
given a particularly cheesy sting when it is discovered that the
grappling hook device used for the rescue won't reach its intended
target. 
Mission to Mars is push button filmmaking to the greatest extreme. 
Events are set into motion that are obvious to anyone who has ever seen
a movie and seem like they are just there to evoke an emotional response
in the audience.  We are apparently supposed to be upset that Tim
Robbins character removes his helmet in deep space and kills himself to
save his wife, but I felt extreme boredom coupled with a twinge of
disinterest.  What makes it all worse is that fact that there is no real
reason that Robbins' character needs to turn himself into a popsicle,
except to invoke an emotional response (I could think of at least ONE
way to save him, and the NASA clowns in this film are supposed to be
"smarter" than I am). 
During the finale, when we are finally introduced to the translucent,
conehead, kitty-faced aliens that we ostensibly sprung from, we are
presented with some of the most ridiculously cartoonish CGI ever put to
film (just slightly worse than the plane crash at the end of Air Force
One or the Hell scenes in Spawn).  A brief history lesson about "where
we came from" is proffered, then Sinise is whisked away to be with "the
rest of our people" (he does this because his late wife proclaims in a
video he watches early on that "this is a chance to step foot where no
one else has"). 
>From the press I've been seeing this film receive, it is apparent that
Mission to Mars will be dying a quick death at the theater.  I'm sure
the first weekend or two will be huge, but once word gets out people
will stop going.  Let's just hope the upcoming Red Planet is better than
this and isn't hurt by the negativity this film is generating.  I'd
venture to say it won't be worse than this waste of time.  [PG]
Reviewed by Brian Matherly - bmath2000@hotmail.com
The Jacksonville Film Journal - http://www.jaxfilmjournal.com/

Author
Mark O'Hara
Witnessing a journey through space is an epic experience, and no film makes 
the journey more visually stunning than MISSION TO MARS.  Unfortunately, 
other aspects are stunningly bad.
Starting at a send-off for NASA astronauts embarking on a Mars voyage in 
2020, MISSION TO MARS follows the lives of several astronauts.  Quickly we 
meet Luc Goddard (Don Cheadle) and his mates in the flight;  friends of his 
who have been excluded from the flight are Woody Blake (Tim Robbins), his 
wife Toni Blake (Connie Nielsen), and Jim McConnell (Gary
Sinise).  Jumping ahead several months, the narrative joins up with the 
mission that has already begun to explore the surface of Earth's neighbor.
Suddenly a catastrophe devastates the mission and the explorers themselves.  
Later, NASA officials on an orbiting space station receive the mayday call, 
and a rescue is organized.  Following yet another series of mishaps, the 
rescue party is also faced with the prospect of being lost in space.  Acting 
as an anchor for the tale is an enormous edifice in the shape of a graceful 
face - no doubt a sign of intelligent life.  What is supposed to keep our 
interest is the prospect of contact between the humans and whatever may be 
hiding out in the great sloping visage.
Acting in the film is pinioned by the wooden dialogue.  As early as the 
party before the first launch, characters deliver background information via 
lines they would never speak in real life.  Jim McConnell especially is a 
victim of the stiff script: he must buck up under the premise of his beloved 
fellow-astronaut and wife having wasted away and died before his eyes.  As 
he plays this soul-searching space traveler, Sinise wears too much eyeliner 
and delivers his lines with a quietness fraught with repression.
Tim Robbins also seems out of kilter here.  At times he attempts the 
emotional poeticism he achieved well in THE SHAWSHANK REDEMPTION, but floats 
out of the range of transparent acting;  again, the script weighs his 
character down.  One gets the feeling while watching these excellent actors 
that they accepted their roles not to further the depth of their careers, 
but to make money for financing their own production companies.
Of course it must have been attractive to work with a director as respected 
as Brian DePalma. DePalma has his cinematographer employ lovely, spiralling 
shots that defy gravity and stop just short of making viewers dizzy.  In 
space it doesn't matter if one is upside down, and we experience vicarious 
disorientation when the camera closes in from space and narrows down to 
Woody and Toni Blake working on a test and on their marriage.  Ultimately, 
though, DePalma gets little direction from screenwriter Jim Thomas, and the 
narrative ends up getting lost.
Most effects in this film are strong.  From dust storms on the surface of 
Mars to slow motion, horrifying ballets in the vacuum of space millions of 
miles from Earth, we see magnificent vistas.  What assaults the eye, 
however, is some of the computer generation bedecking the final few minutes. 
  Oddly conceived and outlandishly plastic, these images seem prematurely 
born and developmentally incomplete.  The close leaves us with cinema 
vitiated by bad science and New Age malarkey.
MISSION TO MARS is diverting entertainment, but time will not add it to the 
canon of must-see sci-fi films about space travel.


Author
Mark R. Leeper
     In 1950 ROCKETSHIP XM went to Mars and brought back to Earth a
secret that might determine the future of the human race.  It was the
first major film of the 1950s science fiction cycle.  ROCKETSHIP XM was
early in a sub-genre of space exploration that included FRAU IM MOND,
DESTINATION MOON, PROJECT MOONBASE, THE CONQUEST OF SPACE, 12 TO THE
MOON, COUNTDOWN, 2001: A SPACE ODYSSEY, and possibly CONTACT.  These
are films that have piqued our sense of wonder.  Sadly, we have not
seen many of them of late.  Science fiction films have gone in other
directions with monster films, psychotic killers in space, martial
arts, and chases.  While MISSION TO MARS makes a few false moves in the
final reel, in particular some errors in science, it is a great ride
and it brings back the sense of wonder of some of the 1950s space
explorations films, back when the sky and the future were limitless.
     This film begins in the year 2020 with the first mission to Mars.
Four people are sent to the planet Mars.  The expedition seems to be
going well until an unusual formation is noted on a nearby hill.  Going
to investigate, things go mysteriously and spectacularly wrong.  Now
there is at most one Mars astronaut alive, Luke Graham (played by Don
Cheadle).  A second mission is sent to rescue Luke and continue the
mission.  On this expedition are Jim McConnell (Gary Sinise) and Woody
Blake (Tim Robbins wearing the most uncomfortable-looking piece of
jewelry I have seen in a long time).  Along the way they face some of
the problems and dangers we have seen dramatized previously in films,
but have not seen since visual effects in films have become so agile.
Some of the effects work, particularly motorized vehicles on Mars, do
not look well rendered, but elsewhere some of the effects work is quite
good.  The destruction of the first mission is deliciously eerie.
Another novel scene involves an explosion that could only happen in the
conditions of space and the special effects to portray the scene are
fascinating.  What we get is a film with a sort of nostalgic feel but
which also has a timely sense as consideration is given to staging a
manned mission to Mars.
     This is Brian De Palma's first science fiction film and he has a
healthy respect for the older films.  This is a science fiction film
without guns and chases.  (It is a pity it did not leave out the
product placements also.)  Gary Sinise is a good actor, but his
performance seems a little stilted here.  He is playing a man who keeps
his emotions bottled up, as does Robbins so we have to infer emotions
from the situations.  Sinise deserves good roles, but we see little of
his talent here.  Robbins we do not expect an evocative performance; we
expect his style of under-acting.  Also present are Don Cheadle and
Jerry O'Connell of "Sliders," and both are fine.  There is a fair-sized
role that goes to a mysteriously uncredited Armin Mueller-Stahl.
     The critics are not being very kind to MISSION TO MARS, but I
strongly suspect there will be a contingent of older science fiction
fans who were brought up on 1950s space exploration films and who will
enjoy this film as much as I did.  I rate it a 7 on the 1 to 10 scale
and a low +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.
     Spoiler...Spoiler...Spoiler...Spoiler...
     I do not know if sending married couples into space has been
considered.  But it would be a questionable NASA policy for precisely
the reasons that this film makes clear.
     Some readers will know why I was a little disappointed that when
they found Luke he did not ask his rescuers for a piece of cheese.
     Evolutionary biologist Stephen J. Gould would have a fit if he saw
this film.  The implication of what is learned in the final reel is
that the human stands at the top of the evolutionary tree and that all
evolution is aimed at creating a humanoid creature with our DNA and
even our facial expressions.  That is not the way it works.  We were
formed by our environment in a random walk of adapting to the natural
world.  Plant the same protozoa DNA on two different planets with
different conditions and the resulting species would rapidly diverge.
It is highly unlikely that the most intelligent species on each of two
planets would so resemble each other.  And even if there was a guiding
force they would not end up so different looking.  The error in this
film is closely related to that in THE BOYS FROM BRAZIL, but the
probabilities are far lower here.
     A much better thought out film on Martian survival strategies is
Nigel Kneale's QUATERMASS AND THE PIT (FIVE MILLION YEARS TO EARTH),
which I have long considered the best science fiction film I have ever
seen.  Previously hard to find, it currently seems to run monthly on
the American Movie Classics cable channel.
     It seems unlikely that with two missions to Cydonia there would be
no mention of the famous Cydonia Face on Mars, and in fact they seem
unaware of it.  It is like being in Roswell, New Mexico, and not
knowing about the supposed crashed flying saucer.

Author
R.L. Strong
The realm of Science Fiction has always been an allegory of political
and or moral sensibilities. The best tales of the genre deal with
mankind's struggle for survival or knowledge. Such popular and
noteworthy tomes as "Stranger in a Strange Land" by Robert Heinlein,
"Childhood's End" by Arthur C. Clarke and "Man in the High Castle" and
"Do Androids Dream of Electric Sheep" by Philip K. Dick all deal with
man's need for identity and struggle for self worth.
Hollywood has regularly adapted the milieu (if not the message) of
Science Fiction since it's beginnings. Most films just created fancy
pulp tales with no more thought that the escapism they achieved. It
really wasn't until Producer George Pal, took charge of Robert
Heinlein's novel "Rocketship Galileo" and crafted the film
"Destination Moon", that 'Sci-Fi' (as it is commonly referred to),
came into it's own. From there, such diverse filmmakers as Roger
Corman to Stanley Kubrick, have sought to express ideas through the
medium of the genre. With the release of Touchstone Pictures "Mission
to Mars", we have an unabashedly nonchalant Sci-Fi film for those who
read The National Enquirer and The Globe.
The film opens on a summer barbecue, as Phil Ohlmyer (Jerry O'Connell)
woos a young female with his tales of space glory and the upcoming
mission. Woody Blake (Tim Robbins) and his wife Terri (Connie Nielsen)
commit to his coming authority on the mission, and Luc Goddard (Don
Cheadle) consoles his son.
Entering the party is Jim McConnell (Gary Sinise), who gave up command
of the mission due to the untimely death of his wife,  Maggie (Kim
Delaney). Luc consoles Jim with Woody's assistance. The three men are
friends and carry a fine bond of trust and caring between them. But
Jim still longs to set foot on the Red Planet.
The mission is in earnest as Luc and his team land in the Cydonia
region of Mars. They send out the rover to investigate the area and
discover what seems to be water or ice under the surface. Going out to
investigate, Luc and his team approach the famed 'Face on Mars'. A
strange noise emanates from the rock. As the team tries to scan
through the rock with radar, a violent wind storm erupts, creating a
vortex that kills all members of the team, save for Luc.
Back on the space station orbiting Earth, Woody and Jim receive the
information that the Mars landing team is missing. Luc's interference
laden emergency message urges the two men to attempt a second mission
to the red planet in the hopes of rescuing the previous team. The
second journey to the Martian world is fraught with danger. Meteorite
showers, explosions, and rescues all come into play as the intrepid
heroes make there way to the planet's surface. The big question is, is
there now or has there ever been intelligent life on Mars. And if so,
what is its relationship with us?
Now for the bad news. The entire plot of  "Mission to Mars" is based
almost wholeheartedly on outdated and preposterous National Enquirer
type Martian civilization tripe. The famed 'Face on Mars' becomes the
centerpiece of the film, revealing some of the most harebrained sci-fi
pabulum  the screen has witnessed. Borrowing ideas from such films as
"Robinson Crusoe on Mars" (1964), Quatermass and the Pit (1967),
"2001: A Space Odyssey", and even Mario Bava's "Planet of the
Vampires"('Terrore nello spazio') (1965), "Mission to Mars" is a
hodgepodge of ideas that don't add up to a satisfying whole.
While some sequences are wonderfully handled and executed, the film
remains flat and un-involving. So much time is giving to establishing
the lead characters in the film, but to no good use. The performances
are all workmen like, with only Don Cheadle (as Luc) carrying any sort
of real chemistry. Gary Sinise is wasted in role that requires him to
look as if he is experiencing sleep depravation. And the mistaken idea
of having Jerry O'Connell (as Phil Ohlmyer) play his part for comic
relief is just too painful to excuse. And the less said about Tim
Robbins called in from home performance the better. He's just having
too much fun here to give a damn.
The script has a few lapses, namely that after discovering several
breaches in the hull of the ship caused by a meteorite shower, no one
thinks of checking the fuel tanks or the remainder of the ship for
damage. This of course leads to our heroes having to abandon their
rescue ship. Also, when one character sacrifices himself,  the
character takes on a religious demeanor that is completely at odds
with the situation.
But the biggest offence in the film is the horrid, intrusive score by
Ennio Morricone. Subtlety is non-existent here. In fact in some scenes
the music becomes so extravagant that dialogue is almost drowned out.
The only sequence in which the score almost works is during the
protracted meteorite shower.
The pacing of the film is very leisurely. After the opening
introduction of the characters (which lasts a full 22 minutes), we are
finally dropped onto the Martian surface. Then, there is another long
pause in the plot for more character development, including an
elaborate dance sequence in zero gravity. The film could lose about 30
minutes and actually gain some momentum. There are so many scenes of
talking heads, discussing what we already know is going to happen,
that it drags the film to a dead stop.
The good news is that the film is absolutely sumptuous to look at. The
vistas of the planet Mars are majestic and awe inspiring. The design
of the numerous spacecraft and suits are all expertly drafted, with a
level of realism that hasn't been seen since "2001: A Space Odyssey".
The visual effects are just stunning, from the space walk sequences,
to the visualization of evolution on Earth. The only fault come with
the Martians themselves, which look more like something out of a
plastic model kit than something from another world.
Director De Palma stages some wonderfully creative scenes through out
the film. The opening sequence alone in a seemingly un-interrupted cut
lasting almost 15 minutes (an homage' to Hitchcock's "Rope"), as we
are introduced to all of the characters. Scenes in the rescue ship,
with its rotating centrifuge, are just amazing in their execution. But
the nagging question, is the final explanation worth all of this Sturm
und Drang.
Sadly it is not.
Director Brian De Palma has crafted an extravagant production. The set
design and visual effects are all arresting. But it's the comic strip
denouncement that ruin what might have been a fine return to good
adventurous, thought provoking science fiction. A disappointing film,
but one that might still entertain if you can settle for the visuals.
Š 2000 R.L. Strong
www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Makeup/5594/reviews.main

Author
Michael Dequina
_Mission_to_Mars_ (PG) ** (out of ****)
Virtual missions to Mars are not new to the Walt Disney Company.  Long
before its much ballyhooed revamp, the Tomorrowland area of Disneyland
prominently featured (right next to Space Mountain) a little curio called
Mission to Mars.  It was an attraction, not a ride: patrons would sit in
a circular auditorium that was made to look like a spaceship, and through
some images projected on screens, fancy lighting, and--most important of
all--some vibrating seats, earthlings made "trips" to Mars by the
hundreds about every half hour.
That attraction was indeed cheesy, but after seeing Disney/Touchstone's
new film bearing the name _Mission_to_Mars_, I could not help but feel
nostalgic for those long-gone yesterdays in Tomorrowland.  For one thing,
at least Mission to Mars (the attraction) had vibrating seats--something
that would make this shockingly cornball effort from director Brian
DePalma a little easier to sit through to the very end.  But not by much.
The year is 2020, and NASA has sent a four-astronaut crew to the red
planet.  After encountering a strange storm-like force, the only person
left alive is Mission Commander Luke Graham (Don Cheadle).  A
rescue/recovery team is soon deployed; in this team are Graham's old
friends Jim McConnell (Gary Sinise), Woody Blake (Tim Robbins), and
Woody's wife Dr. Terri Fisher (Connie Nielsen), as well as scientist Phil
Ohlmyer (Jerry O'Connell).  Of course, such an operation is easier
planned than executed, and the crew of the Mars Recovery Mission run into
their fair share of trouble en route to the planet.  Their troubles are
encapsulated in an effective extended suspense sequence where one
calamity seamlessly and convincingly leads to another.  The palpable
tension that DePalma is able to create easily compensates for some
shameless product placement.
It's quite unfortunate, then, that this sequence would end on a forced,
unintentionally comic note of melodrama, not helped by some amateurish
emoting by Nielsen.  Just as, at one point, an indicator on Terri's
spacesuit reads "Point of no return," this is also the juncture where
_Mission_to_Mars_ gets progressively, irreparably worse.  Upon landing on
Mars, the film, which had been a diverting spacefaring adventure with an
impressive command of technical detail, decides to become a sci-fi film
of ideas, ŕ la _2001:_A_Space_Odyssey_ or _Contact_.  Those familiar with
DePalma's body of work know that his instincts are more attuned to the
former than the latter.
The problem with the turn runs deeper than a directorial miscast,
however.  _Mission_to_Mars_ has already used up over half of its
113-minute length by the time the script goes all profound, hardly enough
space to tackle the highfalutin ideas writers Jim Thomas, John Thomas,
and Graham Yost want to tackle.  So it's little surprise that this part
of the story feels rushed, which, in turn, results in a superficial
treatment that renders the point laughably trite.  The film's trailer not
only completely divulges its big "secret" (I won't spoil it for those who
haven't seen it), but also lifts the film's exploration of this idea in
its complete form.  Those intrigued by the trailer and looking for deeper
backup of the central idea in the actual film won't find it, for what's
in the trailer is all there is.
Such a disastrous final act is especially disappointing in the case of
_Mission_to_Mars_, for it is an adequate entertainment for its first
two-thirds.  Pedestrian story details such as Jim's sadness over his
deceased astronaut wife are smoothed over by the convincing acting of
Sinise, Cheadle, and Robbins; the effects, which are, if hardly
groundbreaking, functional; and the painstaking attention to the
technical side of space travel.  Unfortunately, what one remembers
strongly about _Mission_to_Mars_ is the corny conclusion, which leaves a
bitter taste--so bitter, that it was able to completely wash away the
flavor of the unlimited free Mars candy bars given away at the press
screening.
Michael Dequina
twotrey@juno.com | michael_jordan@geocities.com |
jordan_host@sportsmail.com | mrbrown@iname.com
Mr. Brown's Movie Site:  http://welcome.to/mrbrown
CinemaReview Magazine:  http://www.CinemaReview.com
on ICQ: #25289934  |  on AOL Instant Messenger: MrBrown23

